


Why Don’t Vanguard’s Target Retirement and LifeStrategy Funds Own Admiral Shares? — Oblivious Investor
















My Books
About
Contact
Archives
Oblivious InvestorLow-Maintenance Investing with Index Funds and ETFs 

Home
Taxes

2017 Tax Brackets
2016 Tax Brackets
2015 Tax Brackets
How Are S-Corps Taxed?
How to Calculate Self-Employment Tax
LLC vs. S-Corp vs. C-Corp
SEP vs. SIMPLE vs. Solo 401(k)


Accounting

How to Calculate Amortization Expense
How to Calculate Cost of Goods Sold
How to Calculate Depreciation Expense


Roth IRA

Roth IRA Withdrawal Rules


Can I Retire?

401k Rollover to IRA: How, Why, and Where
Single Premium Immediate Annuities and Retirement Planning


Investing 101

Asset Allocation and Risk Tolerance
Why Invest in Index Funds?
8 Simple Portfolios


Social Security

How is Social Security Calculated?
How Social Security Benefits Are Taxed
When to Claim Social Security
Social Security Strategies for Married Couples


Economics

4 Factors of Production
Consumer and Producer Surplus
How to Calculate Marginal Revenue



New Here? Get the Free Newsletter
Oblivious Investor offers a free newsletter providing tips on low-maintenance investing, tax planning, and retirement planning. Join over 17,000 email subscribers:

Articles are published Monday and Friday. You can unsubscribe at any time.

Why Don’t Vanguard’s Target Retirement and LifeStrategy Funds Own Admiral Shares?
One question I receive periodically is why the Target Retirement and LifeStrategy funds at Vanguard hold “Investor” shares of the underlying funds, rather than the less expensive “Admiral” shares. Emily Farrell, Head of U.S. Business PR at Vanguard, was kind enough to provide the answer.
—–
Piper: Why don’t the LifeStrategy and Target Retirement funds use Admiral shares as the underlying holdings?
Or, if there’s a concern about that being a way to “cheat” to get access to Admiral shares without meeting the requirements, why not have an Admiral share class for the LifeStrategy and Target Retirement Funds, with a higher minimum investment (i.e., a high enough figure such that a person investing that amount via an identical DIY allocation would qualify for Admiral shares of all or most of the underlying funds)?
Farrell: Vanguard is unable to offer multiple share classes on funds of funds due to the structure in which we operate, and the agreement we have with the SEC regarding multiple share classes. Our funds of funds have no direct costs — the costs are derived only from the ERs of the underlying funds. According to that agreement, we must be able to offer a differentiated cost advantage between share classes. (Therefore, because there is no direct cost associated with a fund of fund — it’s not possible for us to offer such an advantage).
As you may recall, we launched a suite of Institutional TRFs in 2015. Note, however, those are not share classes — they are an entirely new set of mutual funds.
Piper: Given that Vanguard can only have one share class of a fund-of-funds, how does Vanguard decide which share classes to hold within such funds? The “normal” (non-institutional) versions of the funds-of-funds each hold Investor shares of the underlying funds. Would Vanguard ever consider holding Admiral share classes in these funds?
And, for example, the Vanguard Institutional Target Retirement 2050 Fund (VTRLX) holds Institutional shares of one underlying fund, Admiral shares of another fund, and Investor shares of two funds. What’s the line of thinking there?
Farrell: It is largely based on the cost to serve the underlying shareholder of the TRF or LifeStrategy Fund. These funds tend to attract small balance accounts and IRAs, and the cost to serve is disproportionately higher than funds with large and diverse shareholders. In terms of looking into adding holding Admiral in the Investor suite of TRFs, in short, the answer is yes — we consistently review our products, product structures, and product line-ups. However, given the size of the average TRF account and our cost allocation methodologies, we would not expect a change from Investor Shares. Specific to the underlying holdings of the Institutional suite of TRFs, again, it is cost to service the funds and our cost allocation methodologies that dictate the share class utilized.
—–
So, to paraphrase, Vanguard’s position here is, “in a Target Retirement or LifeStrategy fund, we hold whichever share class (or share classes) result in an expense ratio that most closely reflects the cost to service the fund’s shareholders.” In hindsight, that feels sort of obvious, given Vanguard’s general “at cost” pricing philosophy.
New to Investing? See My Related Book:




Investing Made Simple: Investing in Index Funds Explained in 100 Pages or Less

See it on Amazon.





Topics Covered in the Book:

Asset Allocation: Why it's so important, and how to determine your own,
How to to pick winning mutual funds,
Roth IRA vs. traditional IRA vs. 401(k),
Click here to see the full list.

A Testimonial:

"A wonderful book that tells its readers, with simple logical explanations, our Boglehead Philosophy for successful investing."
- Taylor Larimore, author of The Bogleheads' Guide to Investing

Read other reviews on Amazon

July 24, 2017 Welcome

Hi. I'm Mike Piper, the author of this blog. I'm a CPA and the author of several personal finance books. The point of this blog is to show that investing doesn't have to be complicated. Click here to read more, or enter your email address in the blue form to the left to receive free updates.

Follow This Site





 











Recommended Reading


Investing Made Simple: Investing in Index Funds Explained in 100 Pages or Less
See it on Amazon
Read customer reviews on Amazon




My Latest Book


Microeconomics Made Simple: Basic Microeconomic Principles Explained in 100 Pages or Less
See it on Amazon





Treasury Circular 230 Notice
Any U.S. tax advice on this blog is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, for the purpose of (1) avoiding penalties under the Internal Revenue Code or (2) promoting, marketing, or recommending to another party any transaction or matter addressed on this blog.


Disclaimer: By using this site, you explicitly agree to its Terms of Use and agree not to hold Simple Subjects, LLC or any of its members liable in any way for damages arising from decisions you make based on the information made available on this site. I am not a financial or investment advisor, and the information on this site is for informational and entertainment purposes only and does not constitute financial advice.
Copyright 2017 Simple Subjects, LLC - All rights reserved. To be clear: This means that, aside from small quotations, the material on this site may not be republished elsewhere without my express permission. Terms of Use and Privacy Policy








 




Vanguard Review - The Best Option For All Investors?




















































































 



 


















Home > Stock Brokers > Vanguard Review
Vanguard Review – The Best Option For All Investors?










Review of: Vanguard
Reviewed by: Larry Ludwig
Published on: July 1, 2017
Last Modified: July 1, 2017







Editor Rating
Rated 3.5 stars












Use Vanguard to get a wide selection of low-cost, no-load mutual funds, ETFs, stock broker services, and financial planning. For investors wanting a one-stop shop for all their banking and financial needs, you'll have to look elsewhere.
 


The Vanguard Group is the grand daddy of low-cost indexed based mutual fund investing. Started in 1975 by Jack Bogle, he understood over 80% of actively managed funds did not beat the market’s indices. His mantra, is you aren’t best to beat the market, you should become the market, and focus on low cost fees.
Vanguard has grown to become the world’s largest no load mutual fund company. While Vanguard is mostly known for its low-cost index funds, they also offer a variety of low-cost, actively managed mutual funds and exchange-traded funds (ETFs). 
Vanguard also provides brokerage services, variable and fixed annuities, educational account services, financial planning, asset management, and trust services.
In the same spirit of shedding further insight on the different investment options available to consumers, today, I wanted to share with you my experiences with Vanguard’s investment services. Personally, I have been a Vanguard account holder since 1999. Overall, I have found Vanguard offers a wide selection of mutual funds and ETFs at a low cost, but their website to be somewhat outdated and clunky.

Vanguard Features



Minimum Deposit
$3,000


Stock Trades
$0 – $20


Options Trades
$0 – $20 + $1/contract


Mutual Funds
$0


Accounts Available
Traditional IRA, Roth IRA, Rollover IRA, Annuities and Individual


Mobile App
Yes — Apple iOS and Google Android


Customer Service
 Phone


Promotions
None





Account Options
Currently, Vanguard offers the following account options. Beside each type of account, I’ve included a brief summary of my experiences, where applicable.

401(k) rollovers to a Vanguard IRA – This type of account enables you to transfer your 401(k) retirement account at your previous employer and convert it to a traditional IRA with Vanguard. I completed this process in with my wife’s 403(b) with a former, and the process was executed without any failures or delays. And, better yet, there were no additional penalties/fees incurred by the process from Vanguard.
Annuities – Vanguard offers both fixed income and variable annuities. While I don’t personally have one of these, I understand Vanguard has some of the lowest rates in the industry for annuities. This is mostly because they don’t have full-time sales people selling their product and pass the discount onto you.
Roth IRAs and Traditional IRAs – Vanguard gives investors the option of opening either a Traditional (pre-tax contributions) or Roth (post-tax contributions) IRA. I have been using a Roth IRA from Vanguard for 3 years now, and I have found it a very effective investment vehicle with their low cost mutual funds.
Individual (taxable) Accounts – Lastly, Vanguard allows you to save money in taxable accounts in either stocks, bonds, CDs, or mutual funds.







Investment Types
The Vanguard Group offers a very comprehensive array of investment options, regardless of the type of account you choose to open. This review focuses only on Vanguard’s “bread-and-butter” – mutual funds and ETFs.
Vanguard Mutual Funds

121 total mutual funds – including money market, international, balanced, bond, REIT, and stock mutual funds.
Vanguard offers both actively (stock picking) and passively (tracking an index) managed mutual funds.
Offers lower fee “Admiral Shares” mutual fund options. These shares generally require a balance in the mutual fund of at least $10,000. However, the expense ratio for these Admiral Shares is generally 30-50% lower than that of the normal mutual fund shares.

Vanguard ETFs

In addition to mutual funds, Vanguard has also become a major player in the ETF markets, currently offering 52 different ETFs in the majority of the same areas that they offer mutual funds.
Generally, ETFs have expense ratios ~0.1% lower than the same asset class of mutual fund. While this is not a huge difference, it can add up over the years with larger account balances.

In most cases, especially if you have complete control over your investment account, you would want to choose the Vanguard ETFs over their mutual funds. Not only are most cheaper, but typically are more tax efficient.

Fees and Commissions
Vanguard charges no commission for trading their mutual funds and ETFs.  Purchasing stocks and non Vanguard ETFs through Vanguard can be expensive.  This isn’t surprising since their focus is on low cost mutual funds.
Stock and ETF Fee Schedule



Amount
Stocks and ETFs




Less than $50,000
$7 for the first 25 trades
$20 for subsequent trades


$50,000–$500,000
All trades: $7


$500,000–$ 1 million
All trades: $2


$1 million plus
Free for first 25 trades
$2 for subsequent trades



Unless you have a somewhat large account with them, Vanguard isn’t a great place to trade stocks. You are best to use other discount brokerages. Vanguard’s service is lacking features when comparing to other discount stock brokers. Based upon experience though, if you are wanting to use Vanguard you are only interested in purchasing Vanguard only mutual funds and ETFs.
For other discount brokers, please visit our best stock broker web page.


Minimum Balance and Initial Deposit
Generally, the minimum investment amount for Vanguard mutual funds is $3,000 which is somewhat steep for the first time investor. However, for Vanguard ETFs, the minimum is only 1 share and might be best suited for beginning investors. Vanguard also offers admiral shares which have even lower in annual fees. To qualify:

Invest $10,000 or more in most Vanguard index funds that offer Admiral Shares.
Invest $50,000 or more in Vanguard actively managed funds that offer Admiral Shares.

Vanguard recently lowered the dollar requirements and is great news for investors.

Mutual Fund and ETF Screener
Find the best Vanguard fund or ETF(Click To Enlarge)Vanguards screener is a very effective tool to find the right fund that meets your investing criteria. You can filter based upon: asset class, minimum deposit, risk level, share class, and tax efficiency. 
Once you find the right Vanguard fund for you, you can invest directly. You can also compare the various funds to find out which performed better. It’s a useful tool since Vanguard has over 100 ETFs and mutual funds.

Customer Service
Overall, the ease of use of the online Vanguard system, and corresponding customer service has always been very effective and straight-forward. Whenever I am unable to figure out something online, it is always easy to get a real, live person on the phone who is knowledgeable and can assist.

Vanguard Portfolio Watch
Recommended asset allocation(Click To Enlarge)The portfolio analysis tool is provided for free by Vanguard. You can gain insight in to your asset allocation as well as the overall costs of taxes, and manage risks associated with your portfolio. Their summary section it will give automated recommendations to modify your portfolio.
It does not support external accounts into asset allocation consideration. This is another example of the Vanguard only centric view their service has.

Summary
Vanguard is great if you use their funds and ETFs. When you venture outside of this realm, their service is ok at best. If you ever decide to buy individual stocks, you are best to find another stock broker for that purpose. Vanguard’s research tools are almost nonexistent. Unless you have a significant amount invested with them, it may not make sense to use their service for the lower trading fees.
It is assumed you go for Vanguard only for their low cost indexed mutual funds and ETFs. Though they are no longer have exclusivity in this area. Most mutual fund houses offer similar, and in some cases lower annual fees when compared to Vanguard. Many of the brokers offer commission free ETFs, further lowering your transaction costs to match Vanguard.
I recommend using Vanguard for your retirement account if possible (there are many poor alternatives unfortunately), or if you prefer to use only Vanguard funds for your investing. Firms like Fidelity, and TD Ameritrade offer much more comprehensive services, if you are looking for a one stop brokerage firm.
Readers: How would you rate your experience with Vanguard?




 Share31 Tweet11 Share Reddit Email 
Suggested For You

Vanguard Personal Advisor Services Review 2017 - Low-Cost, Personal ServiceBetterment Review 2017 - Making Investing SimpleCapital One Investing Review - Automatic Investing with Low FeesFidelity Review - Comprehensive Brokerage and Banking ServicesPersonal Capital Review - Track your Investments for Free 




Comments





Notify of 


new follow-up comments
new replies to my comments








 








 




















 Notify of new replies to this comment


















 




















 Notify of new replies to this comment














Sort by:  
                            newest | 
                            oldest
                                                            | most voted



A Rooks3 months 6 hours agoHorrible to deal with after my father’s death.  Getting his IRA into my mother’s name has taken weeks of mailings and multiple phone calls and it still isn’t resolved.   Ameritrade has brick and mortar offices where we were able to do the same transactions within one afternoon.  They may or may not be good portfolio managers, but do your beneficiaries a favor and invest elsewhere.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧kend996 months 7 days agoI’ve been a Vanguard customer since the early 1990s and have had no bad experiences. In the past week (Jan 2017) I had them transfer a rollover IRA from Fidelity to my Vanguard IRA brokerage account. All it took was a phone call to Vanguard and electronically signing a document on their website. Five business days later, the transfer was complete with exactly the right number of shares moved.  I have no complaints.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧DK7 months 20 days agoVanguard is completely incompetent at making any sort of changes. They are great if you don’t need them to do anything. Call in and wait for 20-40 minutes to talk to a 20-year old who would have a hard time turning on a computer let alone doing something for your account. They screw up everything and take weeks in order to process requests. Always a different story from a different unqualified call center person. There’s always a new excuse. Ask them for a document, they send you the wrong form. These guys are the WORST, why would people trust them to handle your retirement? Worst move that I ever made. Closed and transferred my account today (after over a month of paperwork and bs from them). What a relief. Stay Away.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Bob9 months 22 days agoI have been a Vanguard Flagship client for many years.
i was happy with them until about a year and a half ago, when working with them became a nightmare. They have triggered taxable distributions several times over 2 years by incorrectly crediting a dividend from a Vanguard Fund held in my IRA to the settlement account for my taxable account. I was told several times that this is a “systems problem” that it had been fixed, but it just kept happening. 
Recently, my taxable settlement account balance suddenly and incorrectly dropped from just over +100,000 to -150,000! It isn’t even a margin account! It took several days to fix this. I have been unsuccessful at trying to reach a manager. It seems like they just don’t care anymore. 
Needless to day, I am researching options to transfer my IRA (just over $1 million) and developing a strategy to move my $775,000 taxable account away from Vanguard. The taxable account will be tricky, because of substantial unrealized gains.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Sidney9 months 22 days agoI think the reviewer got it exactly right. I’ve been with Fidelity, TD Ameritrade, and now Vanguard. If you are an active trader,  other brokers have more and better options. However, if you have a retirement account, I think Vanguard is probably the best place to be. Recently, within the last year Vanguard has updated and improved it’s website and account service.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Last Iconoclast10 months 26 days agoI became a Vanguard customer after reading founder John Bogle’s famous book on investing some 25 years ago. In recent years, their quality of service has gone down hill to the point I will be transferring all of my sizable assets to Fidelity, with whom I already have a 401K account through my employer. Vanguard’s employees are uninformed, poorly trained, difficult to get a hold of, and their bureaucracy makes facilitating simple transactions all but impossible. They may be low cost, but you also get what you pay for. Google “Vanguard Customer Service Reviews”, and then look elsewhere to invest your hard-earned money.
4  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Scott11 months 16 days agoI’ve been doing business with Vanguard for 20+ years.   They are a pioneer and leader in low cost funds and ETFs however they are getting very big and most recently I have experienced some serious problems with their customer service; in particular,  with account transfers taking a very long time.   In fact I was trying to transfer an IRA to Vanguard and after 4 weeks I finally gave up and transferred the account to a different brokerage.   My account representative is still very responsive and is trying to help but I get the feeling that their back office operation is either under staffed or incompetent or perhaps bureaucracy has just overtaken the organization.    My experience also seems to be echoed in other online reviews (see Vanguard on the consumeraffairs.com website)    Hopefully Vanguard management is listening and will address these problems.
7  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Joe11 months 20 days agoFirm doesn’t employ service personnel; just a tape recording promising to be with us shortly.
Highly recommend you take your business elsewhere.  I certainly intend to do so!
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Susan Hines1 year 3 months agoHi, I inherited stocks and bonds from my parents 2 years ago.  I left it with Edward Jones, but I feel that I am not getting the best advise.  I am NOT money smart, but I know I need this money to grow if I am ever to retire.  I am wanting to switch all monies to Vanguard.  How on earth do I know what I am doing.  I know I need to tell them where to invest the money?  HELP!!
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Dan1 year 4 months agoI have to say after reading some of the comments I am really surprised. I have been with Vanguard a little over 4 years now and am extremely happy with them. I called them today to make a change to my Roth IRA and I was able to speak with a live person in less than 5 minutes. They are always willing to help and offer what advice they can. This company has been very good to me and I plan on staying with them for life.
11  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Vang Cust1 year 6 months agoThe objective merits of Vanguard and its products are well documented. 
I will not keep more than a token amount of money at Vanguard however, because their customer service is inadequate. Their phone hours are far too limited outside of East Coast business hours. 
Getting through to them during business hours recently has been beyond difficult. For example, after waiting an hour to speak to a person, that person transferred me to another department, where I just ended up in an interminable hold. What good is a brokerage that will not speak to its customers?
4  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Dart1 year 8 months agoVanguard services, once good have been deteriorating recently.
Making mistakes which gthey are in no hiurry to fix, thuis preventing purchases.
I’m cashing in.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Margaret1 year 11 months agoI would rate my experience with Vanguard as extremely poor. My husband transferred his IRA account from a local bank to Vanguard online, and mistakenly checked the wrong box and had it end up as being a IRA “brokerage account” rather than a traditional-type IRA like mine at Fidelity, where transferred amounts go straight into a cash reserves account. Granted it was his fault, but to rectify it Vanguard wanted to charge him $35 per sale transaction, which would have come to a total of $500-$600. (So much for low-fee investing.) The attitude of the customer service rep we spoke to was more or less “Too bad, so sad, sucks to be you.” So as of tomorrow, he will be joining me as a happy Fidelity customer. I bet it’s one of the shortest relationships with Vanguard on record – less than a week.
2  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Bob Foss2 years 1 month agoI’ve been dealing with both companies for 25 years.  I think your comments are quite correct.  I don’t trade individual stocks, so using Vanguard funds works well for me, though I have several Fidelity funds that I occasionally feel I should just move over to Vanguard.  My wife has her entire investment portfolio with Fidelity has done quite well as she asked me to select more aggressive funds for her back in the late 80s and they have done well.  Vanguard does have one advantage for new investors.  You can invest with just $1000 with their popular STAR fund.  It is a good balanced fund consisting of some of Vanguard’s best mutual funds.  This fund of funds has been modified over the years and has become a bit more aggressive, thus enhancing returns.  The for-profit nature of Fidelity leads some I think to lean more toward Vanguard.  Still, some of Fidelity’s funds with higher expense ratios still do better overall than Vanguard’s comparable funds, so going with one over the other is a matter of personal preference.
2  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧biginvestor2 years 1 month agoThough Vanguard has many great funds with low fees, they are a horror to deal with. I transferred several mutual funds in-kind to Vanguard. After tying up my money for over one month,  not allowing normal trading, I had to get the SEC to help complete the transfer. If you read around online you will find horror stories from people wanting to do simple things through Vanguard.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Lindsey2 years 2 months agoAppreciate your advice.  Honestly, I have just dealt with their “customer service” ( Vanguard, Julie Davis and Vanguard, Robert McCreavy) on the QDRO side and they need to rename the group.  Two senior people have merely pointed me in the direction of the 800 number despite their refusal to provide my account number.  Seems to be an effort to keep my account from moving because they refuse to provide redemption paperwork despite numerous requests for a simple form.  So far they have kept my account hostage and won’t even provide paperwork in order to release funds!  If I didn’t already want to move my money, they’ve certainly convinced me!  I’m leaving Vanguard kicking and screaming for Fidelity who has always done exactly as promised!
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Christopher Kraven2 years 3 months agoHi my name is chris I’m 52 years old and i have about 16 to 18 years till retirement i have 3 questions :1 can i open an account at Vanguard for ETFS with 1000.00 and add 1000 or 2000 each year after that or do i need more money?  2 i would happily add more money each year as I’m on a fixed income and i wouldn’t touch this UNTIL I RETIRE is this ok to do? 3 if i put money say 2000 a year do u think I’d have a decent retirement savings in 20 years ? Your input is greatly appreciated thanks so much
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Frank R.2 years 4 months agoI would appreciate if anybody could give me his/her opinion on the following matter: I am planning to invest 100-200k in a MANAGED investment account. Would you put this money in Fidelity or Vanguard? Please consider the following in your answer:
 1. I am average when it comes to knowledge of the investments world
 2. I am conservative to moderate in nature when it comes to taking risk
 3. Long term view – I am investing for my retirement.
 4. I like to be able to know how my investments are doing regularly
 5. I don’t have time/expertise to manage investments myself.
 6. I would like to be able to reach someone quickly if I have issues or questions.
I have heard very good things about both Fidelity and Vanguard. I like the local presence of the Fidelity offices and advisors and the low costs of Vanguard. About Vanguard, though, they require that you give them the money before they sketch out a plan for investments…Anybody has or had issues with this requirement?
Thanks a million for your opinion.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Lee2 years 4 months agoThanks for the straightforward comments about Vanguard. 
Of course, all sides are taken but when it comes to retirement funds, you want efficiency in managament, security, and true customer service.  No one want their money held hostage.  There are reasonable time frames for tranactions.  There will be situations when we need access in liquidity.  Yes, those 2 words, “customer service, ” are touted (or rather slung about) in our day-to-day dealings and we have all found that sad cases account for about 87% of the time.  Everyone wants your money.  Everyone!  You usually get what you pay for and it is a challange to ferret out the cream part of the milk.
Vanguard will be examined tightly
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧vanguard annunities. from Dr. Kevin Grold2 years 4 months agoI wish someone had told me…. I love vanguard. I love John Boogle….but when it comes to vanguard annuities…don’t go there!!!  I hope I save one life the frustration of dealing with a bunch of drunk, chain_smoking, retired trained monkeys. I think if you are totally incompetent, then they send you to work in the Vanguard annunity department. I have spent months trying to get two annuities together for my mother and they are still trying to get it right.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Sg2 years 4 months agoI have had problems with Vanguard several years in the past when an account was willed to me. Since I was not holding Vanguard Funds, I transferred the account to another brokerage.
Now, I’m holding several Vanguard Funds at another brokerage I would save $1000 a year if the funds were at Vanguard. So, here’s what happened when I tried to transfer some funds to Vanguard. They held the paperwork for 2 weeks before sending it to the other brokerage. The other broker responded within 2-3 days. Transfer over, you would think. Not so. The funds, considerable, are now in a twilight area at Vanguard. They can be traded but each trade would take 3-5 days instead of the normal 1 day. It’s almost 1 month since I started the transfer, yet I still do not have full control of my funds.
4  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Day2 years 5 months agoDear Sir,
I’ve got a small Trust acct. that I can invest (have trading authority under terms of doc.) for my own benefit. I can move it to any broker(s) I choose to work with. Currently using a “full service” brokerage house that uses NFS (a division of Fidelity) to clear the trades and custody assets. I want to move it to a low-cost discount broker where I’ll pay lower fees. Unfortunately many of my positions won’t transfer “in kind” to other firms. I’ve already been told that TD Ameritrade, Scottrade & Trade King can only receive some of the assets, but not all. I own many foreign companies that don’t trade on the U.S. Exchanges. Do you think Vanguard could help me in this regard? I really want a firm that can offer me the most options & investment flexibility. And one where I won’t have to leave any assets behind at my current brokerage firm. Does this make sense? I have “lost my shirt” following all the investment advice of my current broker. And I’am worried the account will never recover. ANY advice you or your readers can give me would be MOST APPRECIATED. Thanks much.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Steve2 years 5 months agoHi, can you address some of these customer complaints we are seeing?  If it’s true as countless people are noting, that they freeze accounts readily, then don’t have the interest or authority to get you back on, that they give many people trouble getting their funds out, that they complicate every little error they or you make with their “byzantine bureaucracy”  and generally make old customers realize that this company has turned into a monster that is simply coasting on it’s former reputation for integrity.,  IF this is true, we need to know.   Nothing else matters if they are not trustworthy if they are adversarial with clients.  Who wants to fight all time with a big company over one’s money?   Please look into this and give us some idea if they are still a high integrity company.
thanks
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Mike2 years 5 months agoSteve,
I’ve had an account with Vanguard and until recently really liked the firm.  I encouraged a number of friends and family to switch over to Vanguard based on their lower fees.  However, I’ve had a recent experience that has totally reversed my faith and confidence in Vanguard.
I was asked by Vanguard to “upgrade” an established mutual fund account with the firm to a brokerage account.  Essentially, the “upgrade” was of no real benefit to me, but it was explained to me would make some of the accounting easier for Vanguard.  So, I agreed to the “upgrade”.
Turns out the “upgrade” triggered a compliance issue, as Vanguard no claimed it was unable to verify my identity and it froze all of my account at Vanguard.  I was unable to access or trade when some significant movement was taking place in the market.
Despite repeated call to Vanguard, no one there is able to make a logical decision.  The firm created the issue and does not follow the actual requirements of the laws/regulations it claims are imposed upon it by the federal government.  Instead Vanguard’s CIP program is flawed and not consistient with the actual Code of Federal Regulations that governs Broker-Dealer transactions.  Vanguard simply refuses to recognize that its Compliance policy is out of sync with the CFR, it claims to be following.
I was so troubled by the matter, I took the time and effort to file a complaint with FINRA.  I am not sure how much control FINRA will decide to exercise with Vanguard, but common sense seem to be in extremely short supply at Vanguard.  For them to ask a customer to upgrade one of their accounts and then turn around and manafacture  a bogus identity conflict and freeze the customer’s account is a sign that the firm is experience difficulties and might be a sign of future problems on the horizon.
The inability to correct a simply mistake created by Vanguard and the firms willingness to alienate an otherwise loyal client is inexcusable.  Hopefully, FINRA can interject some logic into Vanguard and if nothing else at least ensure that their compliance policy are actually in sync with the regulations, as opposed to be just vague assertains of fantasy by Vanguard.
When you check online, you can see tons of complaints by clients and mostly now former clients of Vanguard of events similar to mine, where Vanguard self creates a client identity problem and locks the client out.  I would suspect, that as others have suggest Vanguard staff is now composed of younger less experienced individuals that simply don’t take the time to know what is proper or just operate by knee jerk reactions.  It’s sad, but I can not recommend Vanguard at this point.  
What good are lower fees, if in the end the firm creates more problems for you and wastes your time so easily.  It only foreshadows likely future problems and frustrations.  Maybe paying a higher fee is worth it if you can deal with competient representatives and have confidence that your funds are protected and always available.
Sorry, to report such bad news about Vanguard!
5  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Larry Ludwig2 years 5 months agoHi Steve,
While I have a Vanguard account myself personally I cannot confirm or deny claims made by other commentators.
-2  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Disgusted2 years 6 months agoI said goodbye to Vanguard today after 10 years!  The customer service front line has deteriorated over the years to 20 something, ill trained wanna be investment kids.    The website IT staff–thank you very much–felt the need to change the website which used to be a breeze to use to a more clogged and complicated site where you need to dig down to find anything.   There is no real way to speak with an “experienced” person to answer questions or even complain.   Multiple attempts failed to find a supervisor and hold times were so hideous I hung up three times.   Two emails this week were never returned in “two days” –in fact, none at all.    It was not worth the frustration attempts to find someone to help when the gatekeepers who man the phone lines know nothing.   So….goodbye.
I had plans to transfer an employee IRA in about two years to Vanguard—no more.    Filed today to get out and move 10 years of loyalty somewhere else.    There is not even any corporate office to explain why I left or complain.    Corporate hides behind the idiot front line youngsters.   Good bye.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jim Dougherty2 years 6 months agoI keep earning dividends which Vanguard says ONLY increases my share balances but NOT the account balances.  Since I’m a CPA and know this not to be correct within SEC guidelines (and for example, Fidelity increases shares and account balances for reinvested dividends as does ComputerShare for DRIPs.)  My question is whether any of you are experiencing the same thing in your accounts?  Just had $5200 of dividends increase my share balances but not my account balances.  Anyone else experiencing the same thing?  I’ve confirmed with the SEC that this accounting treatment is not proper……ergo….giving me a increase of a hypothetical 100 shares in my account without a corresponding increase in my account balance at the then current share price is illegal.  This seems to be standard Vanguard procedure……but not at Fidelity or Computershare…..would appreciate some independent advice.  By the way, it took Vanguard over three weeks to respond to my questions about this illegal practice.  I would love to give someone my $5200 of dividends reinvested into 100 hypothetical shares for $0!!!!!!!  It’s a scam that requires legal attention.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧eugi2 years 2 months agoDid your issue get resolved? I am thinking of investing with them and it scarce me to hear these things because unlike you I would be getting scam not knowing it.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Mia P.2 years 7 months agoMy employer will start a relationship with Vanguard January 2015 for our retirement accounts.  I am now with Lincoln and am wondering if it is a better idea I end my relationship with Lincoln and start my retirement account with Vanguard?  Also, is there any way I can rollover my current money with Lincoln to Vanguard though I am still with the same employer?  Your advice would be helpful because this can be very confusing for a professional with no investment experience.
Look forward to your response.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Nancy G2 years 8 months agoWorst customer service ever.  They cashed a rollover check of mine and still haven’t deposited it in my account two and a half months later.  They are thieves in my personal opinion.  I am now issuing a fraud suit against them.
5  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Troy Holmes2 years 9 months agoJust try to get Vanguard to give you your money back… Good luck! Once they got the official paperwork from TD Ameritrade to roll $200+ K into my accounts there Vanguard simply continued to lose the paperwork from the brokerage firm and now they continually put me on hold or hang up on me.  This has been going on for over a month now.  They are crooks! You are better off simply retaining an attorney and allowing them to do all the work so they can start the timeline on the litigation or settlement.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧mo3 years 1 month agoDo not use Vanguard!  They may be cheap, but they hold your money hostage.  When you look at their site and want to invest,  see if you can find a link for taking your money out.  If you do happen to find it, try to use it.  The link does not take you to distribution form.  What I’m saying is you can easily put your money in with a few clicks, but it could take weeks to get your money out.  However, I got my money out of Fidelity in a few minutes with a simple phone call.  I am still waiting to hear rom Vanguard.
2  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jeremy2 years 6 months agoI get the feeling it’s because Fidelity has a lot of outgoing transfers, and have made it easy.  VG seems to be the opposite….
-4  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Sarah2 years 9 months agoYep I know someone who just had this happen to them they’ve waited 2 weeks for their money amd still havent gotten it.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Liza3 years 6 months agoHi there,
My husband and I are in our early 30s, and trying to figure out the best option for a retirement account. My husband is a teacher, and unfortunately, the companies offered to manage his 403B through his school district are all poor options I associate with high hidden fees and poor returns. Because of this he hasn’t opened his 403B yet. Vanguard is not offered. A friend of ours who works in finance suggested we open an account with Ameritrade and invest in low cost index funds. He also suggested we open a roth IRA, rather than an IRA. I feel very naive about what the right path is to take in terms of investments, and just want a safe, non-risky option. Any suggestions?
Thank you!
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Larry Ludwig3 years 6 months agoHi Liza,
Under SEC law, since we are not registered advisers, cannot give you specific investment advice. What I will say is there are differences between the two. Fidelity’s site is a good summary:
https://www.fidelity.com/retirement-ira/ira-comparison
Regarding your husband’s 403b. If they do offer matching it’s an instant return on that money (ie say 3%). Even with high fees you come out ahead. Also depending upon your tax bracket can reduce your AGI decreasing the taxes you pay now. If the 403b does offer high annual maintenance fees, and high annual expenses funds with no matching it might not be as good an offer.
We have a post that lists the order of investing to be the most tax efficient.
https://investorjunkie.com/2898/tax-efficient-investing/
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Rand4 years 3 months agoMy wife and I are looking to roll over moneys into Vanguard – but my wife read discouraging reviews by investors who complained it was hard to get their money out of vanguard in a timely matter.  Wondering if anyone can offer insights into this aspect.
We are in it for the long haul – but there will come a time when we will need to remove money from vanguard.
Thanks!
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧dr2 years 4 months agoI have accounts at both Vanguard and Fidelity.  I have a significantly larger account at Vanguard, yet the level of competence is much lower at Vanguard. What is noticeable:
1. Vanguard customer service is far inferior, it is often like talking to a federal employee, ready to retire & waiting for a coffee break at the same time. You can never get the same person to follow up on anything, and they don’t seem particularly competent or care how much of your time you waste.
2. They have a really hard time understanding how to transfer Assets, and always get you to someone who doesn’t understand
3. There inherited asset transfer process is a time consuming waste. For 3 months I worked on have assets transferred to Vanguard. Hours & hours & hours of time! Always someone new, always different info. Today on the phone with Vanguard for another 2 hours & 10 minutes!  All the while the funds were put in cash 3+ months ago when my transfer paperwork was completed.  Finally I picked up the phone to fidelity, and had instant great knowledgeable customer service, with the individual offering to be my point of contact.   Vanguard is not worth the trouble! 
4. The employees seem complacent, and seem to lack the drive and initiative to get something done!
The Annuity department in particular, needs to get a little staff change.
Hope I save some one the trouble. If the going gets slow & wastes your time over at Vanguard, quit while you are ahead, it won’t get better.
2  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧lmoney4 years 5 months agofrom Vgd website: For mutual fund accounts – $20 fee waived for shareholders who have elected to receive statements and other important information electronically.
Brokerage accounts have a $20 fee for accts under $50K.
So if you have several Mutual Fund, ROTH, IRA accounts you will not pay a annual fee with e-statements, the only acct you will pay a fee on is the Brokerage account (if you have one).
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jogesh4 years 6 months agoThere are two more issues with Vanguard –
The speed and success of trading stocks or options, as they are not “market maker”, they probably have to go thro’ third party. This is even bad when spread is large!
No choice for trailing stops  etc, so you have to monitor prices and due to delay in execution in falling market you tend loose capital.
Your comments please.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Larry Ludwig4 years 6 months agoJogesh,
I recommend two brokers if you want Vanguard indexes, and trading stocks and options.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Aquinas4 years 7 months agoJust read this year-old+ thread and will add one point: Vanguard generally gets high marks as a fiduciary because it is a not-for-profit company.  It’s neither privately owned (as Fidelity is) nor publicly traded on the stock market (as many mutual fund companies are).  So Vanguard has to answer only  to its customers–they own the funds–and not to  people/shareholders who own shares of the company.  That’s one reason the fees are low.  The only other mutual fund company like this is TIAA-CREF.  See David Swenson’s book Unconventional Success for further details.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Lindsay1 year 7 months agoHow does that work exactly, that Vanguard brokerage managers have to answer to their customer-owners?  I don’t see customers organizing and running Vanguard.  The truth seems to be that the inmates (managers) are in charge of the asylum, and while the funds seem to work very well, the brokerage is a disaster, which is why so many people are complaining about errors, huge delays getting things done or fixed, and egregiously bad customer service.  As someone else said here, corporate managers seem to hide behind first-level account reps.  Customers don’t manage or own, they just leave, that’s what I’m doing.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Larry Ludwig4 years 7 months agoHi Aquinas. Thanks for your comment. We do keep these reviews updated and will be updating it in the near future to reflect updates to their service.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 5 months agoHi Don – Yep, that’s correct. It has to be Vanguard’s proprietary products. Honestly, unless you are investing in Vanguard products, having a Vanguard account isn’t the cheapest way to trade stocks, bonds, etc in general
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Kevin Cimring6 years 2 months agoAgreed that if you intend trading in and out of your positions often then a Vanguard brokerage account may not be the cheapest. For investors who look to buy low-cost index funds or other investments for the longer term, perhaps rebalancing once or twice a year, its a great option to consider.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey5 years 11 months agoWell said Kevin. I evaluate my asset allocation levels once per month (with Vanguard), but typically only end up actually rebalancing maybe twice per year.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Don6 years 5 months agoAmount Stocks and ETFs
Less than $50,000 $7 for the first 25 trades
$20 for subsequent trades
$50,000–$500,000 All trades: $7
$500,000–$ 1 million All trades: $2
$1 million plus Free for first 25 trades
$2 for subsequent trades 
Regarding the sliding Vanguard brokerage fees tied to value of the account…it’s my understanding that the amounts listed must represent holdings in VANGUARD PRODUCTS in order to move trading fees.  Non-Vanguard holdings don’t count.  Am I wrong?
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Ian6 years 6 months agoI’m pretty new to Vanguard (been with them for less than a year) and mutual fund investing altogether.  But I love my experience with my Roth IRA with them so far and intend to hopefully stay with them for a very long time.  I currently just have my money in their STAR (VGSTX) fund but once it hits $3000 I plan to roll it into a different fund.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months ago@ Ian – Nice! that’s actually exactly how I started off as well (with the STAR fund because I didn’t have the 3k needed for the regular funds). I just checked Vanguard’s website, and it is an actively managed fund in that the funds that it owns are actively managed. This can lead to higher fees. However, it’s a good place to start!
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Ika_W2 years 3 months agoI just open a Roth IRA account with Vanguard. As I did not have any investment experience, I decided to go with all in one balanced funds, Target Retirement and Star. I did not wanted to invest all and hold some contribution just as cash account, but was told by costumer service, that in order to do so, I have to open money market account with them. Little confusing.
Reading some of the discouraging reviews posted below in regards to problems of getting your money back from Vanguard, I am horrified. Hope I did not make a mistake choosing Vanguard.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Mike@atfinancialplan.com6 years 6 months agoI have both fidelity and vanguard. The Vanguard funds are more transparent, e.g., they provide detail of all reinvestment within the fund. The fidelity funds don’t do this at least the ones that I have in my retirement plan.
Mike
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Frank R.2 years 4 months agoI would appreciate if anybody could give me his/her opinion on the following matter:  I am planning to invest 100-200k in a MANAGED investment account.  Would you put this money in Fidelity or Vanguard?  Please consider the following in your answer:
1. I am average when it comes to knowledge of the investments world
2. I am conservative to moderate in nature when it comes to taking risk
3. Long term view –  I am investing for my retirement.
4. I like to be able to know how my investments are doing regularly
5. I don’t have time/expertise to manage investments myself.
6. I would like to be able to reach someone quickly if I have issues or questions.
I have heard very good things about both Fidelity and Vanguard.  I like the local presence of the Fidelity offices and advisors and the low costs of Vanguard.  About Vanguard, though, they require that you give them the money before they sketch out a plan for investments…Anybody has or had issues with this requirement?
Thanks a million for your opinion.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months agoThanks for reading our review Mike! I have experienced the same thing. Vanguard seems to make it easier to find what you are looking for.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧LifeAndMyFinances6 years 6 months agoVanguard is a great company; my work used to invest our 401(k)s through them and the fees were pretty low. Since then, we’ve moved to Fidelity Investments, and they seem pretty solid as well. No complaints here!
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months agoGreat to hear LifeAndMyFinances! While I do personally prefer Vanguard slightly over Fidelity, I always tell people that if you are investing with either company, you are on the right track!
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Darwin's Money6 years 6 months agoI’m a huge fan; I have my IRA, 529 with Vanguard and always recommend them as an ethical, low-cost solution.  Since fees and diversification are pretty much key to long-term investing, Vanguard’s got it all.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Kevin Cimring6 years 6 months agoI agree with Darwin that Vanguard have an excellent 529 program for college accounts, also known as the Vanguard Nevada 529 Plan as its sponsored by Nevada – well worth checking out.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months agoThat’s great to hear that Vanguard has good 529 options! Since I don’t have any kids yet, I haven’t looked in to it, but it’s good to know that the option is there when the time arises!
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧krantcents6 years 6 months agoI have been a Vanguard customer since the eighties!  I am a big fan, however there are instances I wish they had a little more variety.  I wish some of my prior employers used Vanguard as well.  It would have been a little easier when I left.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months ago@ Krantcents – I have wished the same thing as well about my previous employers using Vanguard. Every past employer of mine has used Fidelity for their 401k plans, though. I think they must do a lot more in marketing their product to companies than Vanguard (maybe this is why they have slightly higher fees???? haha). 
I am curious – as far as more variety goes – what types of products do you wish they had?
-1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧krantcents6 years 6 months agoWhen I compare Vanguard to Fidelity, there are more funds in many more sectors.  Do you need all these choices?  Do you need to take sectors and slice them still thinner?  I don’t know.  I think it goes against Bogle’s philosophy, that is why there aren’t more.  He is probably right!
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months agoIn the books I have read from which I base my investment strategy (Stocks for the Long Run, Random Walk Down Wall Street and books by Larry Swedroe), they all mention that it isn’t necessary to invest in sectors. By simply investing in the total market or in large and small cap value funds, you capture that while maintaining diversification.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Robert M6 years 6 months ago$7 a trade is pretty low.  Yes, you can find brokerages with lower trading fees, you have to wonder if they’re not making hidden money on the bid/ask etc. and there’s a lot to say for consolidating everything with Vanguard; especially for those companies that you want to buy and hold for a long time.
If you’re self employed, Vanguard makes it very easy to set up a Simple or SEP as well.  I haven’t looked into an individual 401k account, but they probably do that too.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Investor Junkie6 years 6 months agoVanguard does offer an individual 401k account.
https://investor.vanguard.com/what-we-offer/small-business/individual-401k
I don’t have a Simple, SEP or individual 401k account with them but more than likely this year or next.  I like their fee structure.
With regards to Vanguard and stock trading, I would say that they are really best suited to only own their funds and ETFs.  IMHO, other mutual funds and stocks you are best opening an account somewhere else (since it really isn’t their focus).  If you have less than $50k, it’s possible you’ll pay $20 a trade. Ouch!
At least for me, consolidating into one vendor doesn’t do anything for me.  Using products like Quicken and a spreadsheet it’s not that hard to determine things like proper asset allocation.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Robert M6 years 6 months agoOne could argue that if you have less than $50k in diversified funds, that you shouldn’t be buying individual stocks. 🙂
That said, if you are going to be buying and selling frequently, or doing complex trades such as options or shorts, then yes, Scottrade, Tradeking, or other would probably be better.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months ago@ Robert – That’s actually a very intriguing question about the bid-ask spread and how it varies between “well-established” investment houses and deep-discount brokerages. I think I’ll put that on my list of things to research and post on!
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧David6 years 6 months agoHmm, so now a follow up question.   Is it a good idea to move money I have from similar s&p 500 index fund (with 0.3% fee) to this fund with 80% less fees?  The challenge is that it’s had about 10% gain since I bought it, so I’ll have some capital gains..  While capital gains taxes may be higher in the future,  I could lose by not have as much to invest now..  I guess it depends on how the market performs in the future..
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Investor Junkie6 years 6 months agoHmm sounds like a lot of variables involved with this one.    I see:
– Amount invested
– How long you plan on keeping it invested in the S&P 500
– Is it long term or short term capital gains
The primary question is how long do you plan on keeping it?  The longer you own it, the more it will drift from the S&P 500 because of the said fees.  The tax rates, while more than likely will be higher than current, is an unknown.
I wouldn’t consider the future market valuation since that’s constant no matter which fund you own.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧David6 years 6 months agoWell, i disagree.  Future market valuation makes a big difference…  If the market goes way up, then staying where I am makes the best sense.  (the fee is only a tiny percentage.. and what I would be paying in taxes this year is earning returns)   If the market is flat, then the fee takes away all the returns.. and it’d have been better to pay gains now, and have less fees.     Of course we all hope the market goes way up in the long run…
The amount invested should not make a difference, but it’s enough that I’m worrying about a 0.3% fee.   I plan on holding it a long time.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Jacob @ My Personal Finance Journey6 years 6 months ago@ David – Agree with Inv. Junkie. It’s a fairly difficult question to know whether now is the correct time to transfer from  your higher cost fund to one with Vanguard. 
Even though I am not a professional money advisor, I would say that I would personally move my fund due to the fact that I would prefer to have all of my funds in one place. And, since Vanguard offers so many low cost mutual funds, I would know that there would be other funds that I could find useful in the future.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Investor Junkie6 years 6 months agoOh I see what you are getting at, yes from the perspective of paying taxes so you can transfer to another account.  Maybe the best way to do it is sell shares when forced to rebalance your S&P 500 allocation?
If you believe in Shiller’s PE10, then in the next 10 years it’s expected we’ll have another round of poor returns.   Though that indicator has been show to be far from perfect.
http://www.multpl.com/
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Robert M6 years 6 months agoDavid, you should be able to transfer the shares without selling them.  Give the Vanguard brokerage services a call.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Investor Junkie6 years 6 months agoRobert, you are correct, but I think David is more referring to getting the lower annual fee with Vanguard’s funds.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Robert M6 years 6 months agoWhoops, you’re right.  My bad.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧David6 years 6 months agoYou mentioned the vanguard admiral shares, with a relatively low $10k investment (it used to be limited to 100k).. but you didn’t mention the fees on that, which are greater than 50% less.. For example, the Vanguard 500 Index Fund Admiral Shares  has a fee of 0.07% vs 0.18% for normal shares.   Fidelity has a similar large investor fund with 0.07% fee, but requires 100k.  
They also have an ETF version with a 0.06% fee, but you’ll have to pay broker commission both buying and selling if you trade somewhere else.   However, Vanguard has commission free trades for Vanguard ETFs, if you use there brokerage services.     I was just looking into that myself…  I’m wondering why anyone would buy the regular mutual fund shares when there is the ETF option with lower fees…   Or is there some other disadvantage that I’m not considering?
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Dr. Strangelove2 years 1 month agoVanguard brokerage does not trade during the pre-market or after-market as, say, Fidelity.  This means that you can lose lots of money on  market, limit and stop orders.With many stocks and efts, smart traders like to trade at these times when the unwashed are not active.  When the market opens, given ETFs and stocks are often far more expensive than the previous night’s close.  Likewise, a stop that you have entered will not be executed if you use a lemon-aid stand brokerage.
3  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Investor Junkie6 years 6 months agoHi David,
Thanks for the clarification of fees.
Regarding mutual fund vs ETF (specifically with Vanguard funds at Vanguard since neither has a trading fee with them), it really comes down the the bid/ask spread is the major issue.  Even then with ETFs like Vanguard’s S&P 500 that’s traded frequently it’s a very small difference.  Right now I show the spread is $0.02 with VOO.
https://finance.yahoo.com/quote/VOO?p=VOO
ETFs that aren’t traded as much this can be a bigger factor.
The other I’ve seen discussed is tax advantages, though I’m not sure really what kind of advantage either would have since they are about as efficient as possible.
The biggest issue with any of them is the tracking error.  I’ve created a graph on Morningstar’s web site comparing the differences in said mutual funds and ETFs:
http://rij.cc/eQnqNG
– Vanguard 500 Index Admiral $11,347.30
– Vanguard S&P 500 ETF  $10,901.96
– Fidelity Spartan 500 Index Inv $11,266.03
– S&P 500 $11,367.16
I showed the past ten years what would $10k be worth today (includes dividends).  Granted this graph is somewhat misleading since Vanguard’s ETF just started in 2009.  If you do one year Vanguard’s ETF and mutual fund are almost the same.  
Though if you compared the three funds compared to what the S&P would be worth, the Vanguard 500 Index Admiral is slightly better.
For most people just starting out it looks like Vanguard’s ETF is a better deal when using Vanguard to make the trade.
0  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧David6 years 6 months agoOh, there is a $20 annual brokerage fee if you have less than $50k total in your Vanguard Accounts.
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧Adam Breazzano1 year 7 months agoHi Dave,
I just wanted to let you know that Vanguard waives the $20 fee if you sign up for electronic mail delivery.
Best,
-Adam
1  |     Reply   Hide Replies ∧







Featured Stock Brokers



					    	Ally Invest Review						



					    	E*TRADE Review						
(recommended) 


					    	Fidelity Review						
(recommended) 


					    	Firstrade Review						



					    	Motif Review						



					    	TD Ameritrade Review						



					    	TradeStation Review						



Stock Broker Resources

How to Choose an Online Broker
How to Transfer to a New Broker
Best Online Stock Broker
Online Broker Comparison List
Who Offers A Virtual Trading Account?
Best Margin Rates
Lowest Priced Options Brokers
Broker Clearing Firms List
Stock Broker Promotions
Best Stock Broker for Beginners


Stock Broker Promotions

Best IRA Promotions
E*TRADE (popular)
Firstrade
Motif Investing
TD Ameritrade (popular)
TradeStation




Table of Contents
Features
Account Options
Investment Types
Fees and Commissions
Minimum Balance and Initial Deposit
Mutual Fund and ETF Screener
Customer Service
Portfolio Watch
Summary

More Details

 
































Buying Vanguard Mutual Funds Vs. ETFs | Investopedia


















































































 























Topics



What's New



Trump Replaces Chief of Staff Priebus With Retired General Kelly




FANG Stocks Hit Nasdaq with Major Bearish Reversal


Topics

News
Financial Advisors
Markets
Anxiety Index
Investing
Managing Wealth
ETFs
The Trump Economy
Retirement
Personal Finance
Trading
ETFs Made Simple
Tech
Life Stages
Small Business
Bitcoin





Reference



Dictionary
Term Of The Day

Free Rider Problem
1. In economics, the free rider problem refers to a situation where some individuals ... 
Read More »



Broker Reviews




Find the best broker for your trading or investing needs
See Reviews



Latest Videos


Influence: Terri Kallsen


Guides

Stock Basics
Economics Basics
Options Basics


Exam Prep

Series 7 Exam
CFA Level 1
Series 65 Exam





Advisors




Advisor Insights
Our network of expert financial advisors field questions from our community.
Ask A Question



Join Advisor Insights
Are you a financial advisor? Showcase your expertise to 20+ million investors.
Join Now



Financial Advisors
Sophisticated content for financial advisors around investment strategies, industry trends, and advisor education.


Find an Advisor

Atlanta
Los Angeles
Boston
New York
Houston





Markets




Markets
The latest markets news, real time quotes, financials and more.



Watchlist
Track stocks and ETFs
Add New Watchlist





Simulator




Stock Simulator
Trade with a starting balance of $100,000 and zero risk!



FX Trader
Trade the Forex market risk free using our free Forex trading simulator.






NEW
                                Academy
                            




Investopedia Academy
Learn from the world's leader in financial education
Check out all courses


Featured Courses



Become a day trader
Start Learning



Excel for Finance
Start Learning



Latest Courses

Become a Day Trader
Excel for Finance
Coming soon: Fundamental Investing
Coming soon: Financial Modeling
All Courses






















Site Log In


Advisor Insights Log In



Newsletters























                Buying Vanguard Mutual Funds Vs. ETFs            


    By David Dierking | November 24, 2015 — 11:36 AM EST    






Share


















































Vanguard has become a popular choice for investors thanks to its long list of low-cost mutual funds. Vanguard has added a full menu of exchange-traded funds (ETFs) to its lineup, making the company one of the leading providers for both investment products.
Most Vanguard index mutual funds have a corresponding ETF. Both products are very similar in management style and returns, but there are differences that can make one product more appropriate than another. Vanguard's products also carry expense ratio differences between mutual fund/ETF pairs that must be examined to make the best choice.
The Difference Between Mutual Funds and ETFs
Tradability of shares is the most significant difference between mutual funds and ETFs. Mutual fund shares price only once at the end of the trading day. Investors can place trade orders throughout the day, but the transaction is only completed at the end of the trading day.
ETFs carry more flexibility; they trade like stocks and can be bought and sold throughout the day. In many cases, ETFs carry lower expense ratios than their mutual fund counterparts, but they must be traded in a brokerage account. ETF trades could come with brokerage commission fees. Investors must decide between a buy-and-hold strategy or a trading strategy to determine which product may be more advantageous.
The Difference Between Vanguard's Investor Class and Admiral Class Shares
The mutual fund versus ETF debate for Vanguard products in part comes down to how much is being invested. Most Vanguard mutual funds come with $3,000 minimum initial investments, but some can be initiated with a $1,000 investment. Initial investments of $10,000 or more are eligible for the company's lower-cost Admiral share class. These are essentially the same products as the investor-class shares, but they come with cheaper expense ratios. The Admiral class shares tend to outperform their investor class share counterparts.




Comparing Vanguard Investor Class Mutual Fund Shares to ETFs
The popular Vanguard 500 Index Fund and the Vanguard S&P 500 ETF provide good examples of the cost and trading differences that come with mutual funds and ETFs, although most mutual funds and ETFs in the Vanguard lineup follow a similar pattern.
The 500 Index Fund comes with an expense ratio of 0.17%, while the S&P 500 ETF has a much lower expense ratio of just 0.05%. On a $3,000 investment, investors are paying $5.10 a year in expenses in the mutual fund as opposed to $1.50 with the ETF. The overall cost difference is minor, but it could make a difference for an investor who wants to put the money in an account and leave it untouched until retirement. Conversely, an investor who wants a little more trading flexibility would opt for the ETF, although the trading commissions from a few trades could make it more costly overall. The choice often comes down to investor preference.
Comparing Vanguard Admiral Class Mutual Fund Shares to ETFs
When considering the Admiral shares of the Vanguard 500 Index, the decision between the mutual fund and ETF changes. This fund's expense ratio is 0.05%, which is identical to the ETF's expense ratio. This makes the mutual fund just as advantageous as the ETF for long-term buy-and-hold investors. Only investors who trade throughout the day would find the ETF more desirable. Investors who want to trade but are comfortable with the once-a-day pricing of mutual funds are likely to find that product more beneficial, since there would be no transaction fees involved if they are traded through Vanguard directly.
Conclusion
The decision between a Vanguard mutual fund or a Vanguard ETF comes down to trading flexibility and the amount to be invested. The Vanguard portfolio of investment choices as a whole is generally considered among the lowest cost and highest rated in the investment marketplace, and these products can make ideal choices for long- and short-term investors.









  






 











































      Trending
    



The Trump Economy: News and Analysis




Announcing the Top 100 Most Influential Financial Advisors




Who is Anthony Scaramucci?




Why Retiring on 70% of Your Income Might Be Tough




Investopedia's Guide to Impact Investing







Hot Definitions



                                                    Free Rider Problem                                            

 1. In economics, the free rider problem refers to a situation where some individuals in a population either consume more ...  



                                                    Dumping                                            

 In international trade, the export by a country or company of a product at a price that is lower in the foreign market than ...  



                                                    Tender Offer                                            

 An offer to purchase some or all of shareholders' shares in a corporation. The price offered is usually at a premium to the ...  



                                                    Ponzi Scheme                                            

 A fraudulent investing scam promising high rates of return with little risk to investors. The Ponzi scheme generates returns ...  



                                                    Dow Jones Industrial Average - DJIA                                            

 The Dow Jones Industrial Average is a price-weighted average of 30 significant stocks traded on the New York Stock Exchange ...  



                                                    Revolving Credit                                            

 A line of credit where the customer pays a commitment fee and is then allowed to use the funds when they are needed. It is ...  












Trading Center















Partner Links



















Want to learn how to invest?
Get a free 10 week email series that will teach you how to start investing.
Delivered twice a week, straight to your inbox.









No thanks, I prefer not making money.



























 

Dictionary:
#
a
b
c
d
e
f
g
h
i
j
k
l
m
n
o
p
q
r
s
t
u
v
w
x
y
z




Content Library
Articles
Terms
Videos
Guides
Slideshows
FAQs
Calculators
Chart Advisor
Stock Analysis
Stock Simulator
FXtrader
Exam Prep Quizzer
Net Worth Calculator




Connect With Investopedia
























Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers




Get Free Newsletters
Newsletters









Work With Investopedia
About Us
Advertise With Us
Write For Us
Contact Us
Careers



© 2017, Investopedia, LLC.

All Rights Reserved
Terms Of Use
Privacy Policy




























Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft












Why Don’t Vanguard’s Target Retirement and LifeStrategy Funds Own Admiral Shares? — Oblivious Investor
















My Books
About
Contact
Archives
Oblivious InvestorLow-Maintenance Investing with Index Funds and ETFs 

Home
Taxes

2017 Tax Brackets
2016 Tax Brackets
2015 Tax Brackets
How Are S-Corps Taxed?
How to Calculate Self-Employment Tax
LLC vs. S-Corp vs. C-Corp
SEP vs. SIMPLE vs. Solo 401(k)


Accounting

How to Calculate Amortization Expense
How to Calculate Cost of Goods Sold
How to Calculate Depreciation Expense


Roth IRA

Roth IRA Withdrawal Rules


Can I Retire?

401k Rollover to IRA: How, Why, and Where
Single Premium Immediate Annuities and Retirement Planning


Investing 101

Asset Allocation and Risk Tolerance
Why Invest in Index Funds?
8 Simple Portfolios


Social Security

How is Social Security Calculated?
How Social Security Benefits Are Taxed
When to Claim Social Security
Social Security Strategies for Married Couples


Economics

4 Factors of Production
Consumer and Producer Surplus
How to Calculate Marginal Revenue



New Here? Get the Free Newsletter
Oblivious Investor offers a free newsletter providing tips on low-maintenance investing, tax planning, and retirement planning. Join over 17,000 email subscribers:

Articles are published Monday and Friday. You can unsubscribe at any time.

Why Don’t Vanguard’s Target Retirement and LifeStrategy Funds Own Admiral Shares?
One question I receive periodically is why the Target Retirement and LifeStrategy funds at Vanguard hold “Investor” shares of the underlying funds, rather than the less expensive “Admiral” shares. Emily Farrell, Head of U.S. Business PR at Vanguard, was kind enough to provide the answer.
—–
Piper: Why don’t the LifeStrategy and Target Retirement funds use Admiral shares as the underlying holdings?
Or, if there’s a concern about that being a way to “cheat” to get access to Admiral shares without meeting the requirements, why not have an Admiral share class for the LifeStrategy and Target Retirement Funds, with a higher minimum investment (i.e., a high enough figure such that a person investing that amount via an identical DIY allocation would qualify for Admiral shares of all or most of the underlying funds)?
Farrell: Vanguard is unable to offer multiple share classes on funds of funds due to the structure in which we operate, and the agreement we have with the SEC regarding multiple share classes. Our funds of funds have no direct costs — the costs are derived only from the ERs of the underlying funds. According to that agreement, we must be able to offer a differentiated cost advantage between share classes. (Therefore, because there is no direct cost associated with a fund of fund — it’s not possible for us to offer such an advantage).
As you may recall, we launched a suite of Institutional TRFs in 2015. Note, however, those are not share classes — they are an entirely new set of mutual funds.
Piper: Given that Vanguard can only have one share class of a fund-of-funds, how does Vanguard decide which share classes to hold within such funds? The “normal” (non-institutional) versions of the funds-of-funds each hold Investor shares of the underlying funds. Would Vanguard ever consider holding Admiral share classes in these funds?
And, for example, the Vanguard Institutional Target Retirement 2050 Fund (VTRLX) holds Institutional shares of one underlying fund, Admiral shares of another fund, and Investor shares of two funds. What’s the line of thinking there?
Farrell: It is largely based on the cost to serve the underlying shareholder of the TRF or LifeStrategy Fund. These funds tend to attract small balance accounts and IRAs, and the cost to serve is disproportionately higher than funds with large and diverse shareholders. In terms of looking into adding holding Admiral in the Investor suite of TRFs, in short, the answer is yes — we consistently review our products, product structures, and product line-ups. However, given the size of the average TRF account and our cost allocation methodologies, we would not expect a change from Investor Shares. Specific to the underlying holdings of the Institutional suite of TRFs, again, it is cost to service the funds and our cost allocation methodologies that dictate the share class utilized.
—–
So, to paraphrase, Vanguard’s position here is, “in a Target Retirement or LifeStrategy fund, we hold whichever share class (or share classes) result in an expense ratio that most closely reflects the cost to service the fund’s shareholders.” In hindsight, that feels sort of obvious, given Vanguard’s general “at cost” pricing philosophy.
New to Investing? See My Related Book:




Investing Made Simple: Investing in Index Funds Explained in 100 Pages or Less

See it on Amazon.





Topics Covered in the Book:

Asset Allocation: Why it's so important, and how to determine your own,
How to to pick winning mutual funds,
Roth IRA vs. traditional IRA vs. 401(k),
Click here to see the full list.

A Testimonial:

"A wonderful book that tells its readers, with simple logical explanations, our Boglehead Philosophy for successful investing."
- Taylor Larimore, author of The Bogleheads' Guide to Investing

Read other reviews on Amazon

July 24, 2017 Welcome

Hi. I'm Mike Piper, the author of this blog. I'm a CPA and the author of several personal finance books. The point of this blog is to show that investing doesn't have to be complicated. Click here to read more, or enter your email address in the blue form to the left to receive free updates.

Follow This Site





 











Recommended Reading


Investing Made Simple: Investing in Index Funds Explained in 100 Pages or Less
See it on Amazon
Read customer reviews on Amazon




My Latest Book


Microeconomics Made Simple: Basic Microeconomic Principles Explained in 100 Pages or Less
See it on Amazon





Treasury Circular 230 Notice
Any U.S. tax advice on this blog is not intended or written to be used, and cannot be used, for the purpose of (1) avoiding penalties under the Internal Revenue Code or (2) promoting, marketing, or recommending to another party any transaction or matter addressed on this blog.


Disclaimer: By using this site, you explicitly agree to its Terms of Use and agree not to hold Simple Subjects, LLC or any of its members liable in any way for damages arising from decisions you make based on the information made available on this site. I am not a financial or investment advisor, and the information on this site is for informational and entertainment purposes only and does not constitute financial advice.
Copyright 2017 Simple Subjects, LLC - All rights reserved. To be clear: This means that, aside from small quotations, the material on this site may not be republished elsewhere without my express permission. Terms of Use and Privacy Policy








 




Stock Broker Reviews - The Definitive Online Broker List


































































 



 


















Home > Stock BrokersStock Broker Reviews - The Definitive Online Broker ListThere are so many stock brokers to choose from. Which is the best for you? Well that depends on a number of factors.
Some online stock brokers focus on low commissions and some offer features for the active trader. Do you want to trade stocks or are you a passive investor and only want to trade ETFs and mutual funds?
Other brokerage firms offer research or the full gambit of financial services including banking and home loans. You might want to do your trading on-the-go via a mobile app and most have an app for that.
Check out our reviews of these companies to find out which one would work for your needs.





 
Ally Invest





 
Capital One Investing





 
Charles Schwab







 
E*TRADE





 
Fidelity Investments





 
Firstrade







 
Interactive Brokers





 
Merrill Edge





 
Motif







 
Robinhood App





 
TD Ameritrade





 
TradeStation







 
Vanguard





Learn What the Wealthy Know

                Sign Up for Our FREE Weekly Newsletter. Learn wealth-building strategies to get you on the path towards financial freedom.
        

Email*

Name

  










This iframe contains the logic required to handle AJAX powered Gravity Forms.


Latest Articles





How to Transfer A Brokerage Account – Without the Grief

 July 25, 2017 by Miranda Marquit
When opening a new investing account, it often seems easier just to stick with your existing stock broker — even if you’re dissatisfied with the fees or customer service. Many […]




What Are Options? A Primer in Derivatives

 May 10, 2017 by Kat McKerrow
Just mention options and even some of the most seasoned investors will have the same knee-jerk reaction: “They’re too complicated… too risky… too expensive.” But this is just that — […]




Schwab vs. Fidelity – Which Is Better?

 May 28, 2017 by Kevin Mercadante
There are dozens of investment brokerage firms available to investors, but two of the giants in the industry are Schwab and Fidelity. In a comparison of Schwab and Fidelity, we’re […]




10 Criteria to Consider When Choosing the Right Online Broker

 June 9, 2017 by Kevin Mercadante
On the surface, choosing an online broker seems like a simple process. In reality, however, it isn’t always. You want to make sure this broker has the right credentials, understands […]




Best Stock Broker for 2017 – The Top Online Trading Firms

 July 26, 2017 by Larry Ludwig
There are many different types of traders, as there are discount stock brokers. Whether you are looking to trade in high volume or only conduct a few trades each year, […]




The Best Stock Broker for Beginner Investors

 July 11, 2017 by Carrie Smith
As a beginner investor, it’s easy to get overwhelmed by the stock market. The entire investing idea can seem a bit scary if you don’t know what you’re doing. But […]




Commission-Free ETFs

 May 12, 2017 by Miranda Marquit
Exchange traded funds (ETFs) are a great way to invest. They are easy to trade and relatively low-cost, and they offer the opportunity to invest in a variety of assets. […]




7 Things to Look For in an Online Broker

 June 9, 2017 by Larry Ludwig
Finding an online discount stock broker can be a confusing and complex decision. To a novice, each broker can appear to be the same. In reality, differences can be nuanced, […]
 
Learn What the Wealthy Know

					Sign Up for Our FREE Weekly Newsletter. Learn wealth-building strategies to get you on the path towards financial freedom.				

Email*

Name

  










This iframe contains the logic required to handle AJAX powered Gravity Forms.
 

Featured Stock Brokers



					    	Ally Invest Review						



					    	E*TRADE Review						
(recommended) 


					    	Fidelity Review						
(recommended) 


					    	Firstrade Review						



					    	Motif Review						



					    	TD Ameritrade Review						



					    	TradeStation Review						



Stock Broker Resources

How to Choose an Online Broker
How to Transfer to a New Broker
Best Online Stock Broker
Online Broker Comparison List
Who Offers A Virtual Trading Account?
Best Margin Rates
Lowest Priced Options Brokers
Broker Clearing Firms List
Stock Broker Promotions
Best Stock Broker for Beginners


 Recent Stock Broker Articles
 

What Are Options? A Primer in Derivatives



Schwab vs. Fidelity – Which Is Better?



10 Criteria to Consider When Choosing the Right Online Broker



Best Stock Broker for 2017 – The Top Online Trading Firms



The Best Stock Broker for Beginner Investors


Stock Broker Promotions

Best IRA Promotions
E*TRADE (popular)
Firstrade
Motif Investing
TD Ameritrade (popular)
TradeStation


Best Robo-Advisors

Robo-Advisor Overview
Robo-Advisor Comparison
The Best Robo-Advisors
Betterment vs. Wealthfront


 







































































Vanguard - Vanguard 500 Index Fund Admiral Shares



















Warning: Vanguard.com will not work properly with  JavaScript disabled!










    
  
   








Vanguard homeWarningThis page won't work properly unless JavaScript is enabled.




    
  
   




    
  
   




    
  
   




    
  
   




  Insert Ticker Here  
 






 
   
































    
 All-in-one funds
A diversified portfolio in a single fund 
   



    
 Vanguard Select Funds™
A short list of well-established funds 
   



    
 All our funds

›By fund name›By asset class 
   


Search our funds





There are errors on this page. Mouse over a highlighted field for more information.





  





  

    
 




Vanguard 500 Index Fund Admiral Shares (VFIAX)
Also available as Investor Shares mutual fund and an ETF.


  
  
  








 Overview
 Price & Performance
 Portfolio & Management
 Fees & Minimums
 Distributions
 News & Reviews











  
  
  



 
   



























































Admiral Shares offer lower expense ratios | Vanguard

















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Why Vanguard mutual funds?
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps







Admiral Shares help lower costs even more
Greater cost savings can help you build more wealth over time.
What are Admiral Shares?



Admiral™ Shares are a separate share class of Vanguard mutual funds that were created to pass along the savings that result from larger accounts to the investors who own them.On average, Vanguard Admiral Shares expense ratios are:

				41% lower than our standard Investor Share class.*

				83% lower than the industry average.*


See which Vanguard mutual funds offer Admiral Shares 

Get an overview of all Vanguard mutual fund share classes


How do you qualify?



You must meet—and maintain**—a minimum investment of:

				$10,000 for most index funds and tax-managed funds.

				$50,000 for most actively managed funds.

				$100,000 for certain sector-specific index funds.


Get details on fees & minimums for Vanguard mutual funds


Existing clients: Are you eligible to convert?








We periodically reevaluate all of your fund accounts to see which ones might be eligible for Admiral Shares. If you're eligible and want to convert your shares—tax-free—we'll take care of it for you automatically.
Get answers to your questions about Admiral Shares conversions
If you don't want to wait, log on now. We'll show you which accounts are eligible and walk you through the steps to convert online.
Log on to see if you're eligible to convert today
Please remember that converting your Investor Shares to the Admiral Shares of a different fund may be taxable, depending on the type of account the funds are held in.
 





Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



WANT TO LEARN MORE?

See why Morningstar says low costs beat high costs "every single time"† PDF

Enjoy Voyager® & Flagship Services® benefits as your accounts grow





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Expense ratio







A mutual fund's annual operating expenses, expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets. It's calculated annually and removed from the fund's earnings before they're distributed to investors, directly reducing investors' returns.An expense ratio includes management, administrative, marketing, and distribution fees. It doesn't include loads or purchase or redemption fees.




Return to main page








footnote*Vanguard Admiral Shares average expense ratio: 0.12%. Vanguard Investor Shares average expense ratio: 0.20%. Mutual-fund only industry average expense ratio: 0.69%. All averages are asset-weighted. Industry averages exclude Vanguard. Sources: Vanguard and Morningstar, Inc., as of December 31, 2016.
footnote**If your balance in the fund drops below the minimum requirement, your account may be automatically reclassified to Investor Shares. As with a conversion, this would be tax-free.
footnote†Morningstar study covered expense ratios from 2005 through 2008 and then tracked the funds' progress through March 2010. Total returns were measured as of the end of March 2010 for mutual funds that survived the study period. The study found that in every asset class over every time period, funds in the cheapest quintile produced higher total returns than those in the most expensive quintile.
	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































Balanced mutual funds for asset allocation | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Choose your funds
 




Fund categories
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps








Vanguard balanced funds


100% of our low-cost balanced funds performed better than their peer-group averages over the past 10 years.*




Get a mix of stocks and bonds in one fund
Combine the potential for income and growth



Balanced mutual funds invest in both bonds, which focus primarily on income, and stocks, which aim for investment growth.

Add stability to your portfolio



The bond portion of the fund helps offset the risks associated with the stock portion—providing you with a "balanced" investment.

Automatically maintain your asset mix



You never have to rebalance a balanced fund—it's done for you automatically. Some funds maintain a set asset mix, while others grow more conservative over time.

Spread out your exposure to risk



By potentially holding hundreds—sometimes thousands—of bonds and stocks in a single balanced fund, you get more diversification than you would buying individual bonds and stocks.

How to choose a balanced fund



Picking a Vanguard balanced fund generally depends on whether you're investing for a specific goal, like retirement, or you have another goal in mind.

Target Retirement Funds



If you're investing for retirement, you can get a complete portfolio in a single fund with a Vanguard Target Retirement Fund. Simply choose a fund based on the date you plan to retire or your current age, and the fund will gradually grow more conservative the closer you get to retirement.
See which Target Retirement Fund fits your timeline


LifeStrategy Funds



If you'd prefer a fund that maintains a set asset mix, a LifeStrategy® Fund can help you reach other financial goals.
Match your risk tolerance to a LifeStrategy Fund


Managed Payout Fund



If you're looking to generate income in retirement, Vanguard Managed Payout Fund** might be appropriate for you.
Get income from the Managed Payout Fund


Traditional balanced funds



If you'd like a set asset allocation based on the level of risk you're comfortable with, choose from a variety of traditional index or actively managed balanced funds.
See a complete list of Vanguard balanced funds

Compare index funds vs. actively managed funds






Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



LEARN ABOUT OTHER FUND TYPES

Money market funds

Bond funds

Stock funds

International funds

Sector & specialty funds
NEED SOME GUIDANCE?

Get help & advice to narrow your options





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Balanced mutual funds







Balanced mutual funds invest in stocks, bonds, and sometimes cash or other investments—all in a single fund.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Rebalancing







Rebalancing involves periodically buying and selling the stocks, bonds, cash, or other investments in your portfolio to maintain your original or desired mix of those assets.




Return to main page








footnote*For the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017, 23 of 23 Vanguard balanced funds outperformed their Lipper peer-group averages. Results will vary for other time periods. Only mutual funds and ETFs (exchange-traded funds) with a minimum 10-year history were included in the comparison. Source: Lipper, a Thomson Reuters Company. The competitive performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. View fund performance
footnote**Vanguard Managed Payout Fund is protected by U.S. Patent Nos. 8,180,695 and 8,185,464.
	Investments in Target Retirement Funds are subject to the risks of their underlying funds. The year in the fund name refers to the approximate year (the target date) when an investor in the fund would retire and leave the workforce. The fund will gradually shift its emphasis from more aggressive investments to more conservative ones based on its target date. An investment in a Target Retirement Fund is not guaranteed at any time, including on or after the target date.
	Each LifeStrategy Fund invests in 4 broadly diversified Vanguard funds and is subject to the risks associated with those underlying funds.
	The Managed Payout Fund is not guaranteed to achieve its investment objectives, is subject to loss, and some of its distributions may be treated in part as a return of capital. The dollar amount of the fund's monthly cash distributions could go up or down substantially from one year to the next and over time. It is also possible for the fund to suffer substantial investment losses and simultaneously experience additional asset reductions as a result of its distributions to shareholders under its managed-distribution policy. An investment in the fund could lose money over short, intermediate, or even long periods of time because the fund allocates its assets worldwide across different asset classes and investments with specific risk and return characteristics. Diversification does not necessarily ensure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market. The fund is proportionately subject to the risks associated with its underlying funds, which may invest in stocks (including stocks issued by REITs), bonds, cash, inflation-linked investments, commodity-linked investments, long/short market-neutral investments, and leveraged absolute return investments.
	The Managed Payout Fund may not be appropriate for all investors. For example, depending on the time horizon, retirement income needs, and tax bracket, an investment in the Managed Payout Fund might not be appropriate for younger investors not currently in retirement, in IRAs or other tax-advantaged accounts for those investors under 59½, or for participants in employer-sponsored plans. Investors who hold the Managed Payout Fund within a tax-advantaged retirement account should consult their tax advisors to discuss tax consequences that could result if payments are distributed from their core account prior to age 59½ or if they plan to use the Managed Payout Fund, in whole or in part, to meet their required minimum distribution (RMD) obligations. Distributions from the Managed Payout Fund are unlikely to precisely match an investor's IRA RMD obligations. In addition, use of the Managed Payout Fund may be restricted in employer-sponsored plans by the terms of the governing plan documents and/or at the discretion of the plan administrator. Review the information carefully with your financial advisor before deciding whether the Managed Payout Fund is right for you.
	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































Vanguard funds list - index and active mutual funds | Vanguard


















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Choose your funds
 




Fund categories
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps
















Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



WANT HELP CHOOSING?

Start with our investor questionnaire

Partner with a Vanguard advisor
INVESTOR EDUCATION

Define your goals & have a plan for achieving them

See how 9 model portfolios have performed in the past
INTERESTED IN EXCHANGE-TRADED FUNDS?

Compare ETFs vs. mutual funds












CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































No-load mutual funds | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps







Low-cost, no-load funds are just the start
Get the most for your money: low costs, diligent fund management, and exceptional service.
What you can expect from Vanguard no-load mutual funds








We keep your investing costs low
The average Vanguard no-load mutual fund expense ratio is 83% less than the industry average.*What does that mean for you? When less is taken out of your funds' earnings to cover expenses, more stays in your account—where it belongs.
See the difference low-cost mutual funds can make

See how Admiral™ Shares help lower your costs even more

Get details on fees & minimums for Vanguard mutual funds

 




We have a track record of competitive long-term performance
94% of Vanguard no-load mutual funds performed better than their peer-group averages over the past 10 years.**
Explore different types of mutual funds

 




We hire top mutual fund managers
If you're looking for index funds, look no further. Our Equity Investment and Fixed Income Groups have the experience and expertise you'd expect from the company that launched the first index fund for individual investors.
Learn how index funds could help lower long-term costs
You can also check out our wide selection of actively managed funds. We complement our in-house teams with portfolio managers from around the world, chosen based on their expertise in specific areas of the markets.
Find out if actively managed funds could help you beat the market

 

Want an outside opinion?



Money magazine named 17 Vanguard funds on its "Money 50" list—more than any other fund company.
Find out which Vanguard funds made the list***


What you can expect every day as a Vanguard client








The help you need, when you need it
Whether you're handling day-to-day account management tasks or taking an in-depth look at your portfolio, you can count on the high-quality service you'd expect from an industry leader.
Get help & advice to narrow your options

 




Opportunities for higher levels of personal attention
As your account grows, you can look forward to decreasing costs and increasing levels of personalization and advice.
See what you get as a Voyager or Flagship Services client

 




All the investment flexibility you want
Interested in expanding your portfolio beyond Vanguard mutual funds? With a Vanguard Brokerage Account, you can choose from more than 60 Vanguard ETFs®, gain access to more than 14,000 non-Vanguard mutual funds, or complement your portfolio with individual stocks, bonds, and certificates of deposit (CDs).
Experience the Vanguard ETF® advantage

Invest in stocks, bonds, CDs & funds from other companies

 





Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



PAYING TOO MUCH FOR OTHER FUNDS?

Compare a non-Vanguard fund with a similar Vanguard fund
WANT TO LEARN MORE?

Get more basic mutual fund information





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Expense ratio







A mutual fund's annual operating expenses, expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets. It's calculated annually and removed from the fund's earnings before they're distributed to investors, directly reducing investors' returns.An expense ratio includes management, administrative, marketing, and distribution fees. It doesn't include loads or purchase or redemption fees.




Return to main page








footnote*Vanguard average mutual fund expense ratio: 0.12%. Industry average expense ratio: 0.69%. All averages are asset-weighted. Industry averages exclude Vanguard. Sources: Vanguard and Morningstar, Inc., as of December 31, 2016.
footnote**For the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017, 9 of 9 Vanguard money market funds, 51 of 54 Vanguard bond funds, 23 of 23 Vanguard balanced funds, and 99 of 107 Vanguard stock funds—for a total of 182 of 193 Vanguard funds—outperformed their Lipper peer-group average. Results will vary for other time periods. Only mutual funds with a minimum 10-year history were included in the comparison. Source: Lipper, a Thomson Reuters Company. The competitive performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. View fund performance
footnote***The "Money 50" list published in the January/February 2017 Investor's Guide of Money magazine is based on mutual funds and ETFs that are low-cost and produce long-term returns that match or beat their benchmarks. Past performance cannot be used to predict future returns. Fund share prices will fluctuate, so investors could lose money if they sell when prices have fallen.
You must buy and sell Vanguard ETF Shares through a broker like Vanguard Brokerage Services (we offer them commission-free) or through another broker (you may incur commissions). See the Vanguard Brokerage Services commission and fee schedules for limits. Vanguard ETF Shares aren't redeemable directly with the issuing fund other than very large aggregations worth millions of dollars. Like stocks, ETFs are subject to market volatility. When buying or selling an ETF, you'll pay or receive the current market price, which may be more or less than net asset value.

	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































Index funds | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Choose your funds
 




Index vs. active funds
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps







Index funds could help lower long-term costs
Get the high quality and low costs you'd expect from the company that introduced indexing to individual investors.
What are index mutual funds?



Instead of hiring fund managers to actively select which stocks or bonds the fund will hold, an index fund buys all (or a representative sample) of the securities in a specific index, like the S&P 500 Index.The goal of an index fund is to track the performance of a specific market benchmark as closely as possible. That's why you may hear it referred to as a "passively managed" fund.

Index funds offer built-in benefits








Low costs
Because index funds hold investments until the index itself changes, they generally have lower management and transaction costs.
 




Lower risk through broader diversification
Some index funds give you exposure to potentially thousands of securities in a single fund.
 




Tax efficiency
Broad index funds generally don't trade as much as actively managed funds might, so they're typically generating less taxable income, which reduces the drag on your investments.
 
Compare index funds vs. actively managed funds 

Could actively managed funds help you beat the market?

Read more about what you should consider when choosing an index fund


You can get an index fund anywhere—why Vanguard?








We started the indexing revolution
Vanguard launched the first index fund for individual investors in 1976, and we've been fine-tuning both our benchmark selections and tracking skills ever since.Today, we have more than 60 unique funds that track indexes across the bond and stock markets, both U.S. and international, as well as sector-specific areas of the markets.
See a complete list of Vanguard index funds 

 




We've made it our business to keep your costs low
The average Vanguard index fund expense ratio is 71% less than the industry average.*
See the difference low-cost mutual funds can make 

See how Admiral™ Shares help lower your costs even more 

 


Low-cost investing for everyone



Our passion for low costs will always be our driving force. When others take notice, expense ratios fall more broadly. Everyone wins!
Learn more about The Vanguard Effect™


How would index funds fit into your portfolio?



Because of their low costs, broader diversification, and tax efficiency, index funds could be appropriate for any portion of your portfolio. In fact, the right balance of four of our broadest index funds could give you a complete portfolio, with full exposure to U.S. and international stock and bond markets.Get details on:
Vanguard Total Bond Market Index Fund 

Vanguard Total International Bond Index Fund 

Vanguard Total Stock Market Index Fund 

Vanguard Total International Stock Index Fund 
Need to figure out how much of your money to put into each of these funds? Start with your asset allocation—meaning, the combination of funds that could help you reach your goals.
Set your asset allocation with our investor questionnaire






Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



INTERESTED IN ETFs?
Choose from more than 60 Vanguard ETFs® covering the U.S. and international stock and bond markets as well as industry-specific sectors.
Experience the Vanguard ETF® advantage





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Market benchmark







An unmanaged group of securities whose overall performance is used as a standard to measure investment performance.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Could actively managed funds help you beat the market?







Consider what's happened over the past 15 years1—only about 11% of active stock fund managers and 13% of active bond fund managers have outperformed their designated benchmarks.When you're trying to track the markets and not beat them, you can worry less about how accurate your predictions may be.




Active stock fund managers

				11% outperformed benchmarks.

				89% underperformed benchmarks.


 




Active bond fund managers

				13% outperformed benchmarks.

				87% underperformed benchmarks.


 




footnote1Sources: Vanguard calculations, using data from Morningstar, Inc. Based on funds' excess returns relative to their prospectus benchmark for the 15-year period ending December 31, 2016.



Return to main page







Layer opened.Asset allocation







The way an investment portfolio is divided among the broader asset classes of stocks, bonds, and short-term reserves. Also known as "asset mix."




Return to main page








footnote*Vanguard average index fund expense ratio: 0.08%. Industry average index fund expense ratio: 0.28%. Vanguard average expense ratio: 0.12%. Industry average expense ratio: 0.62%. All averages are asset-weighted. Industry averages exclude Vanguard. Sources: Vanguard and Morningstar, Inc., as of December 31, 2016.
	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market. Bond funds are subject to the risk that an issuer will fail to make payments on time and that bond prices will decline because of rising interest rates or negative perceptions of an issuer's ability to make payments. Investments in stocks issued by non-U.S. companies are subject to risks including country/regional risk, which is the chance that political upheaval, financial troubles, or natural disasters will adversely affect the value of securities issued by companies in foreign countries or regions; and currency risk, which is the chance that the value of a foreign investment, measured in U.S. dollars, will decrease because of unfavorable changes in currency exchange rates. Funds that concentrate on a relatively narrow market sector face the risk of higher share-price volatility. Past performance is no guarantee of future returns. The performance of an index is not an exact representation of any particular investment, as you cannot invest directly in an index.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































Balanced mutual funds for asset allocation | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Choose your funds
 




Fund categories
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps








Vanguard balanced funds


100% of our low-cost balanced funds performed better than their peer-group averages over the past 10 years.*




Get a mix of stocks and bonds in one fund
Combine the potential for income and growth



Balanced mutual funds invest in both bonds, which focus primarily on income, and stocks, which aim for investment growth.

Add stability to your portfolio



The bond portion of the fund helps offset the risks associated with the stock portion—providing you with a "balanced" investment.

Automatically maintain your asset mix



You never have to rebalance a balanced fund—it's done for you automatically. Some funds maintain a set asset mix, while others grow more conservative over time.

Spread out your exposure to risk



By potentially holding hundreds—sometimes thousands—of bonds and stocks in a single balanced fund, you get more diversification than you would buying individual bonds and stocks.

How to choose a balanced fund



Picking a Vanguard balanced fund generally depends on whether you're investing for a specific goal, like retirement, or you have another goal in mind.

Target Retirement Funds



If you're investing for retirement, you can get a complete portfolio in a single fund with a Vanguard Target Retirement Fund. Simply choose a fund based on the date you plan to retire or your current age, and the fund will gradually grow more conservative the closer you get to retirement.
See which Target Retirement Fund fits your timeline


LifeStrategy Funds



If you'd prefer a fund that maintains a set asset mix, a LifeStrategy® Fund can help you reach other financial goals.
Match your risk tolerance to a LifeStrategy Fund


Managed Payout Fund



If you're looking to generate income in retirement, Vanguard Managed Payout Fund** might be appropriate for you.
Get income from the Managed Payout Fund


Traditional balanced funds



If you'd like a set asset allocation based on the level of risk you're comfortable with, choose from a variety of traditional index or actively managed balanced funds.
See a complete list of Vanguard balanced funds

Compare index funds vs. actively managed funds






Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



LEARN ABOUT OTHER FUND TYPES

Money market funds

Bond funds

Stock funds

International funds

Sector & specialty funds
NEED SOME GUIDANCE?

Get help & advice to narrow your options





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Balanced mutual funds







Balanced mutual funds invest in stocks, bonds, and sometimes cash or other investments—all in a single fund.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Rebalancing







Rebalancing involves periodically buying and selling the stocks, bonds, cash, or other investments in your portfolio to maintain your original or desired mix of those assets.




Return to main page








footnote*For the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017, 23 of 23 Vanguard balanced funds outperformed their Lipper peer-group averages. Results will vary for other time periods. Only mutual funds and ETFs (exchange-traded funds) with a minimum 10-year history were included in the comparison. Source: Lipper, a Thomson Reuters Company. The competitive performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. View fund performance
footnote**Vanguard Managed Payout Fund is protected by U.S. Patent Nos. 8,180,695 and 8,185,464.
	Investments in Target Retirement Funds are subject to the risks of their underlying funds. The year in the fund name refers to the approximate year (the target date) when an investor in the fund would retire and leave the workforce. The fund will gradually shift its emphasis from more aggressive investments to more conservative ones based on its target date. An investment in a Target Retirement Fund is not guaranteed at any time, including on or after the target date.
	Each LifeStrategy Fund invests in 4 broadly diversified Vanguard funds and is subject to the risks associated with those underlying funds.
	The Managed Payout Fund is not guaranteed to achieve its investment objectives, is subject to loss, and some of its distributions may be treated in part as a return of capital. The dollar amount of the fund's monthly cash distributions could go up or down substantially from one year to the next and over time. It is also possible for the fund to suffer substantial investment losses and simultaneously experience additional asset reductions as a result of its distributions to shareholders under its managed-distribution policy. An investment in the fund could lose money over short, intermediate, or even long periods of time because the fund allocates its assets worldwide across different asset classes and investments with specific risk and return characteristics. Diversification does not necessarily ensure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market. The fund is proportionately subject to the risks associated with its underlying funds, which may invest in stocks (including stocks issued by REITs), bonds, cash, inflation-linked investments, commodity-linked investments, long/short market-neutral investments, and leveraged absolute return investments.
	The Managed Payout Fund may not be appropriate for all investors. For example, depending on the time horizon, retirement income needs, and tax bracket, an investment in the Managed Payout Fund might not be appropriate for younger investors not currently in retirement, in IRAs or other tax-advantaged accounts for those investors under 59½, or for participants in employer-sponsored plans. Investors who hold the Managed Payout Fund within a tax-advantaged retirement account should consult their tax advisors to discuss tax consequences that could result if payments are distributed from their core account prior to age 59½ or if they plan to use the Managed Payout Fund, in whole or in part, to meet their required minimum distribution (RMD) obligations. Distributions from the Managed Payout Fund are unlikely to precisely match an investor's IRA RMD obligations. In addition, use of the Managed Payout Fund may be restricted in employer-sponsored plans by the terms of the governing plan documents and/or at the discretion of the plan administrator. Review the information carefully with your financial advisor before deciding whether the Managed Payout Fund is right for you.
	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































Stock mutual funds | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Choose your funds
 




Fund categories
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps








Vanguard stock funds


93% of our low-cost stock mutual funds performed better than their peer-group averages over the past 10 years.*




Give your money a chance to grow over the long term
Get higher potential for investment growth



Stock mutual funds aim to provide long-term growth, unlike bond funds, which focus on income. In exchange for more growth, however, you're likely to experience more ups and downs in the value of your investment.

Increase diversification in your portfolio



A stock fund could give you access to hundreds—sometimes thousands—of stocks, which spreads out risk more than owning individual stocks.

Get broad exposure to the stock markets



You can use just a few funds to complete the stock portion of your portfolio. Each of these index funds gives you access to a wide variety of stocks in a single, diversified fund.

Vanguard Total Stock Market Index Fund holds more than 3,000 domestic stocks.

Vanguard Total International Stock Index Fund holds more than 5,500 non-U.S. stocks.


Get details on Vanguard Total Stock Market Index Fund

Get details on Vanguard Total International Stock Index Fund


How to choose a stock fund



Here are a few questions to ask yourself while you're considering the right Vanguard stock fund for your portfolio:

How do stock mutual funds differ from one another?



When looking for a stock fund, consider these two characteristics:

Investing style. In general, stock funds invest in value stocks, growth stocks, or a blend of the two.

Capitalization. Stock funds also choose investments based on the size, or capitalization, of a company. Companies are considered either small-, mid-, or large-cap.


See a complete list of Vanguard stock funds


Do I want domestic or international stocks?








Investing in both U.S. and international stock funds can add another level of diversification to an already well-balanced portfolio.

Would I prefer index or active funds?



Do you feel more comfortable tracking the market, or would you rather try to beat it?

Index funds try to track the performance of a specific market benchmark.

Actively managed funds are steered by our expert portfolio managers who select specific securities for the fund. While actively managed funds give you a chance to beat the benchmark, they can also underperform.


Compare index funds vs. actively managed funds


Should I focus on a specific industry?



You can choose a fund that invests solely in a specific sector of the market, like health care, technology, or telecommunications.But remember, these funds have a very narrow focus and expose you to more risk. Sector and specialty funds should only be used to supplement an already diversified portfolio.
See a list of Vanguard sector & specialty funds






Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



LEARN ABOUT OTHER FUND TYPES

Money market funds

Bond funds

Balanced funds

International funds

Sector & specialty funds
NEED SOME GUIDANCE?

Get help & advice to narrow your options





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Stock mutual funds







Stock mutual funds invest in securities that represent part ownership in publicly traded companies.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Value stock fund







A mutual fund that focuses on stocks from companies that are typically found in low-growth or mature industries, often produce higher and more regular dividend income, and sell at discounted prices.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Growth stock fund







A mutual fund that focuses on stocks from companies that are expected to experience higher-than-average profitable growth because of their strong earnings and revenue potential.Growth stocks typically produce lower dividend yields because they prefer to reinvest those earnings into research and development to help grow these companies and increase their profitability.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Market benchmark







An unmanaged group of securities whose overall performance is used as a standard to measure investment performance.




Return to main page








footnote*For the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017, 99 of 107 Vanguard stock funds outperformed their Lipper peer-group averages. Results will vary for other time periods. Only mutual funds with a minimum 10-year history were included in the comparison. Source: Lipper, a Thomson Reuters Company. The competitive performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. View fund performance
	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss.
	Funds that concentrate on a relatively narrow market sector face the risk of higher share-price volatility. Investments in stocks issued by non-U.S. companies are subject to risks including country/regional risk, which is the chance that political upheaval, financial troubles, or natural disasters will adversely affect the value of securities issued by companies in foreign countries or regions; and currency risk, which is the chance that the value of a foreign investment, measured in U.S. dollars, will decrease because of unfavorable changes in currency exchange rates.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































No-load mutual funds | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps







Low-cost, no-load funds are just the start
Get the most for your money: low costs, diligent fund management, and exceptional service.
What you can expect from Vanguard no-load mutual funds








We keep your investing costs low
The average Vanguard no-load mutual fund expense ratio is 83% less than the industry average.*What does that mean for you? When less is taken out of your funds' earnings to cover expenses, more stays in your account—where it belongs.
See the difference low-cost mutual funds can make

See how Admiral™ Shares help lower your costs even more

Get details on fees & minimums for Vanguard mutual funds

 




We have a track record of competitive long-term performance
94% of Vanguard no-load mutual funds performed better than their peer-group averages over the past 10 years.**
Explore different types of mutual funds

 




We hire top mutual fund managers
If you're looking for index funds, look no further. Our Equity Investment and Fixed Income Groups have the experience and expertise you'd expect from the company that launched the first index fund for individual investors.
Learn how index funds could help lower long-term costs
You can also check out our wide selection of actively managed funds. We complement our in-house teams with portfolio managers from around the world, chosen based on their expertise in specific areas of the markets.
Find out if actively managed funds could help you beat the market

 

Want an outside opinion?



Money magazine named 17 Vanguard funds on its "Money 50" list—more than any other fund company.
Find out which Vanguard funds made the list***


What you can expect every day as a Vanguard client








The help you need, when you need it
Whether you're handling day-to-day account management tasks or taking an in-depth look at your portfolio, you can count on the high-quality service you'd expect from an industry leader.
Get help & advice to narrow your options

 




Opportunities for higher levels of personal attention
As your account grows, you can look forward to decreasing costs and increasing levels of personalization and advice.
See what you get as a Voyager or Flagship Services client

 




All the investment flexibility you want
Interested in expanding your portfolio beyond Vanguard mutual funds? With a Vanguard Brokerage Account, you can choose from more than 60 Vanguard ETFs®, gain access to more than 14,000 non-Vanguard mutual funds, or complement your portfolio with individual stocks, bonds, and certificates of deposit (CDs).
Experience the Vanguard ETF® advantage

Invest in stocks, bonds, CDs & funds from other companies

 





Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



PAYING TOO MUCH FOR OTHER FUNDS?

Compare a non-Vanguard fund with a similar Vanguard fund
WANT TO LEARN MORE?

Get more basic mutual fund information





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Expense ratio







A mutual fund's annual operating expenses, expressed as a percentage of the fund's average net assets. It's calculated annually and removed from the fund's earnings before they're distributed to investors, directly reducing investors' returns.An expense ratio includes management, administrative, marketing, and distribution fees. It doesn't include loads or purchase or redemption fees.




Return to main page








footnote*Vanguard average mutual fund expense ratio: 0.12%. Industry average expense ratio: 0.69%. All averages are asset-weighted. Industry averages exclude Vanguard. Sources: Vanguard and Morningstar, Inc., as of December 31, 2016.
footnote**For the 10-year period ended March 31, 2017, 9 of 9 Vanguard money market funds, 51 of 54 Vanguard bond funds, 23 of 23 Vanguard balanced funds, and 99 of 107 Vanguard stock funds—for a total of 182 of 193 Vanguard funds—outperformed their Lipper peer-group average. Results will vary for other time periods. Only mutual funds with a minimum 10-year history were included in the comparison. Source: Lipper, a Thomson Reuters Company. The competitive performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. View fund performance
footnote***The "Money 50" list published in the January/February 2017 Investor's Guide of Money magazine is based on mutual funds and ETFs that are low-cost and produce long-term returns that match or beat their benchmarks. Past performance cannot be used to predict future returns. Fund share prices will fluctuate, so investors could lose money if they sell when prices have fallen.
You must buy and sell Vanguard ETF Shares through a broker like Vanguard Brokerage Services (we offer them commission-free) or through another broker (you may incur commissions). See the Vanguard Brokerage Services commission and fee schedules for limits. Vanguard ETF Shares aren't redeemable directly with the issuing fund other than very large aggregations worth millions of dollars. Like stocks, ETFs are subject to market volatility. When buying or selling an ETF, you'll pay or receive the current market price, which may be more or less than net asset value.

	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01

































Index funds | Vanguard
















































Skip to main content










VANGUARD WEBSITES


Open an account


Forms


Client support


Log on











Search the site or get a quote

















Menu












Investing
 




Investment products
 




Vanguard mutual funds
 




Choose your funds
 




Index vs. active funds
 










					Learn about mutual funds



					Discover Vanguard's advantages



					Choose your mutual funds



					Decide which type of account



					Open an account in 3 steps







Index funds could help lower long-term costs
Get the high quality and low costs you'd expect from the company that introduced indexing to individual investors.
What are index mutual funds?



Instead of hiring fund managers to actively select which stocks or bonds the fund will hold, an index fund buys all (or a representative sample) of the securities in a specific index, like the S&P 500 Index.The goal of an index fund is to track the performance of a specific market benchmark as closely as possible. That's why you may hear it referred to as a "passively managed" fund.

Index funds offer built-in benefits








Low costs
Because index funds hold investments until the index itself changes, they generally have lower management and transaction costs.
 




Lower risk through broader diversification
Some index funds give you exposure to potentially thousands of securities in a single fund.
 




Tax efficiency
Broad index funds generally don't trade as much as actively managed funds might, so they're typically generating less taxable income, which reduces the drag on your investments.
 
Compare index funds vs. actively managed funds 

Could actively managed funds help you beat the market?

Read more about what you should consider when choosing an index fund


You can get an index fund anywhere—why Vanguard?








We started the indexing revolution
Vanguard launched the first index fund for individual investors in 1976, and we've been fine-tuning both our benchmark selections and tracking skills ever since.Today, we have more than 60 unique funds that track indexes across the bond and stock markets, both U.S. and international, as well as sector-specific areas of the markets.
See a complete list of Vanguard index funds 

 




We've made it our business to keep your costs low
The average Vanguard index fund expense ratio is 71% less than the industry average.*
See the difference low-cost mutual funds can make 

See how Admiral™ Shares help lower your costs even more 

 


Low-cost investing for everyone



Our passion for low costs will always be our driving force. When others take notice, expense ratios fall more broadly. Everyone wins!
Learn more about The Vanguard Effect™


How would index funds fit into your portfolio?



Because of their low costs, broader diversification, and tax efficiency, index funds could be appropriate for any portion of your portfolio. In fact, the right balance of four of our broadest index funds could give you a complete portfolio, with full exposure to U.S. and international stock and bond markets.Get details on:
Vanguard Total Bond Market Index Fund 

Vanguard Total International Bond Index Fund 

Vanguard Total Stock Market Index Fund 

Vanguard Total International Stock Index Fund 
Need to figure out how much of your money to put into each of these funds? Start with your asset allocation—meaning, the combination of funds that could help you reach your goals.
Set your asset allocation with our investor questionnaire






Open your account onlineWe're here to help

If you're new to Vanguard:
Call 800-252-9578
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 8 p.m., Eastern time


If you're already a Vanguard client:
Call 800-888-3751
Monday through Friday
		8 a.m. to 10 p.m., Eastern time



INTERESTED IN ETFs?
Choose from more than 60 Vanguard ETFs® covering the U.S. and international stock and bond markets as well as industry-specific sectors.
Experience the Vanguard ETF® advantage





REFERENCE CONTENT




Layer opened.Market benchmark







An unmanaged group of securities whose overall performance is used as a standard to measure investment performance.




Return to main page







Layer opened.Could actively managed funds help you beat the market?







Consider what's happened over the past 15 years1—only about 11% of active stock fund managers and 13% of active bond fund managers have outperformed their designated benchmarks.When you're trying to track the markets and not beat them, you can worry less about how accurate your predictions may be.




Active stock fund managers

				11% outperformed benchmarks.

				89% underperformed benchmarks.


 




Active bond fund managers

				13% outperformed benchmarks.

				87% underperformed benchmarks.


 




footnote1Sources: Vanguard calculations, using data from Morningstar, Inc. Based on funds' excess returns relative to their prospectus benchmark for the 15-year period ending December 31, 2016.



Return to main page







Layer opened.Asset allocation







The way an investment portfolio is divided among the broader asset classes of stocks, bonds, and short-term reserves. Also known as "asset mix."




Return to main page








footnote*Vanguard average index fund expense ratio: 0.08%. Industry average index fund expense ratio: 0.28%. Vanguard average expense ratio: 0.12%. Industry average expense ratio: 0.62%. All averages are asset-weighted. Industry averages exclude Vanguard. Sources: Vanguard and Morningstar, Inc., as of December 31, 2016.
	All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest. Diversification does not ensure a profit or protect against a loss in a declining market. Bond funds are subject to the risk that an issuer will fail to make payments on time and that bond prices will decline because of rising interest rates or negative perceptions of an issuer's ability to make payments. Investments in stocks issued by non-U.S. companies are subject to risks including country/regional risk, which is the chance that political upheaval, financial troubles, or natural disasters will adversely affect the value of securities issued by companies in foreign countries or regions; and currency risk, which is the chance that the value of a foreign investment, measured in U.S. dollars, will decrease because of unfavorable changes in currency exchange rates. Funds that concentrate on a relatively narrow market sector face the risk of higher share-price volatility. Past performance is no guarantee of future returns. The performance of an index is not an exact representation of any particular investment, as you cannot invest directly in an index.
	Vanguard provides services to the Vanguard funds and ETFs at cost.










CONNECT WITH US®


Facebook


Google+


YouTube


Mobile app




Twitter


Vanguard Blog


LinkedIn


RSS feeds












Home








My Accounts



Log on





Investing



Investment products
Account types
Rollovers & transfers







Advice & Guidance



Partner with an advisor
Investing goals
Life events
Investor education
Calculators & tools
Tax-filing information
Forms





News & Perspectives



News & views
Market summary
Research
Vanguard Blog













© 1995–2017 The Vanguard Group, Inc. All rights reserved. Vanguard Marketing Corporation, Distributor of the Vanguard Funds.Your use of this site signifies that you accept our terms and conditions of useOpen a new browser window.




Privacy policy




Security




Technical support




Mutual fund prospectuses




ETF (exchange-traded fund) prospectuses




Variable annuity prospectuses




Special notice to non-U.S. investors




Careers




Mobile app




Social media




Vanguard Labs




AdChoices



Feedback


1.0.0-M20170512-01, 17.950.1-M20160122-01











































 Vanguard - Product overview - Wellington Fund Admiral

















































































Your input was invalid

























Fact sheet (06/30/2017)A brief product description that includes information on performance, cost, industry weightings, top holdings, investment approach, and portfolio attributes. Updated quarterly.



  Download















Investment profile (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, quarterly commentary on investment performance, and detailed discussion on the management team and investment process. Updated quarterly.



  Download
  















Summary prospectusA simplified, standardized version of a statutory prospectus. Includes discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance intended to make it easier to compare all mutual funds regardless of provider. Updated annually.



  Download















Investment commentary (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including description, style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, and brief quarterly commentary on investment performance. Updated quarterly.



  Download
  















Statutory prospectusIncludes detailed discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance. By law, a prospectus must be provided to a potential investor before he or she can invest. Updated annually.



  Download















Annual report (11/30/2016)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated annually.



  Download















Semiannual report (05/31/2017)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated semiannually.



  Download















Statement of additional informationA document provided as a supplement to a mutual fund prospectus. It contains more detailed information about fund policies, operations, and risks. Updated annually.



  Download









Vanguard portfolio holdings disclaimerPortfolio holdings information:Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the percentage of the fund's total assets that each of these holdings represents as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 15 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month).Vanguard may also publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the aggregate percentage that these holdings represent of the fund's total net assets and equities, as of the most recent month-end, ten business days after the end of the month.Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, a detailed list of the securities (aggregated by issuer for money market funds) held in a Vanguard fund (portfolio holdings) as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 30 days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard Market Neutral Fund (60 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter), Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month), and Vanguard Money Market Funds (within five [5 business days after the last business day of the preceding month). Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, Vanguard may exclude any portion of these portfolio holdings from publication on this Site when deemed in the best interest of the fund.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on a delayed basis and will not necessarily represent all of the actual investments held by the relevant Vanguard fund.Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.The following additional terms and conditions apply to the publication on this Site of any Vanguard fund's portfolio holdings as described above:By accessing the portfolio holdings, you agree not to reproduce, distribute, or disseminate the portfolio holdings, in whole or in part, in any form without prior written permission of Vanguard.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on an "as is" basis, and Vanguard makes no express or implied warranties or representations with respect to the accuracy, completeness, reliability, or fitness of the portfolio holdings or any financial results you may achieve from their use.In no event shall Vanguard or its affiliates have any liability relating to the use of the portfolio holdings.






StyleboxThe stylebox gives information about a fund’s investment style in visual form.For equity funds, a stylebox’s rows and columns indicate market capitalization (small, mid, large) and investment style (value, blend, growth); for bond funds, its rows and columns indicate credit quality and/or duration (short, medium, long).Two important things about a fund are shown in its stylebox:Central tendency. The fund’s central tendency reflects the aggregate characteristics resulting from the fund’s approach to security selection. Because it is based on an analysis of the performance characteristics of the fund’s potential holdings over long periods, the central tendency is expected to be relatively stable. In the stylebox, it is shown as a dot within the shaded oval.Expected range. Within the fund’s universe of potential holdings, and depending on the fund’s investment approach, some categories of investments will be owned more frequently; together, they are known as the expected range. In the stylebox, the expected range of frequently owned categories is represented by a shaded oval.Note: Styleboxes for bond funds uses duration rather than average weighted maturity. Duration is a more accurate measure of interest rate sensitivity because it takes into consideration all mortgage prepayments, puts, and adjustable coupons.






About the optionsFund share classesA fund may offer multiple share classes. The objectives, strategies, and policies for all share classes of a fund are identical. However, expense ratios vary by share class, reflecting the differing costs of providing services to the holders of each share class.Here are some of the key distinctions:Investor SharesTraditional shares for individual investors that typically feature low minimum initial investments.Admiral™ SharesA lower-cost share class generally available without a minimum initial investment requirement to institutional investors and financial intermediary clients. Vanguard created Admiral Shares to recognize and encourage the cost savings stemming from large, long-standing investment accounts and to pass these savings on to the shareholders who generate them.Institutional SharesShares generally available to institutions or other investors with fund account balances of $5 million or more.Institutional Plus SharesShares generally available to institutions or other investors with fund account balances from $100 million to $200 million, depending on the fund.Institutional Select SharesShares generally available to large institutional investors. Fund account minimums range from $3 billion to $5 billion, depending on fund.ETF SharesExchange-traded shares of certain Vanguard index funds, ETF Shares combine the benefits of indexing, such as low costs and broad market diversification, with the trading and pricing flexibility of individual stocks.Vanguard ETF Shares are not redeemable with the issuing Fund other than in very large aggregations worth millions of dollars. Instead, investors must buy and sell Vanguard ETF Shares in the secondary market and hold those shares in a brokerage account. In doing so, the investor may incur brokerage commissions and may pay more than net asset value when buying and receive less than net asset value when selling.Notes:All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest.  









Wellington Fund Admiral Shares (VWENX)


Closed to new investors.







Overview  

 Overview 
 Performance 
 Portfolio 
 Price & Distributions








OPTIONS

as of03/24/2017





Options

Expense ratio
					
Minimum

Admiral
0.16%
N/A
Investor

0.25%
N/A
About our options  







	 	 
	

Fees

•

Purchase fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor buys shares. This fee is not a sales charge or load because it is paid directly to the fund to offset the costs of trading certain securities. None

•

Redemption fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor sells shares. A redemption fee differs from a back-end load because the money is paid back into the fund. Many funds charge redemption fees only when shares are bought and then sold within a specific period of time, generally in an effort to discourage market-timing and short-term trading. Some brokers also charge their clients redemption fees for the sale of securities. None




KEY FACTS


•
Product type: Moderate Allocation
				
•


VWENX inception on 05/14/2001
				

•
Earliest share class inception on 07/01/1929
					

•
$100.7 billion
total net assets
This represents the total net assets for all share classes of Vanguard's U.S. funds, as well as any collective trust that shares the same investment strategy, management and holdings. as of 06/30/2017
					

•
$81.2 billion net assets for
VWENX as of 06/30/2017
				

•
961 holdings as of 06/30/2017
					

•
Benchmarked to the Wellington Composite Index
					


•
Turnover rate (Fiscal year-end  11/30/2016) 30.90%
			
•
CUSIP: 921935201
					





STYLEBOX
StockPortfolio emphasizing large- and mid-capitalization value stocks.

BondPortfolio of intermediate-, short-, and long-term government and investment-grade corporate credits. 



Central tendency

Expected range
How to read our stylebox  







Investment approach


Print PDF



Balanced asset allocation: 60%–70% stocks, 30%–40% bonds.Seeks long-term capital appreciation and reasonable current income, with moderate risk.Large- and mid-cap value stocks.Intermediate-, short-, and long-term government and investment-grade corporate bonds.Fundamental, risk-controlled investment approach.


Total returns
as of 06/30/2017






View as:








Quarter‑end

Month‑end






as of 06/30/2017













14%121086420%     



 
1 year
3 year
5 year
10 year

Since inception
05/14/2001





NAV 
	                        

12.30%
6.84%
10.46%
6.99%
7.57%






Benchmark
Wellington Composite Index*
	                        

11.57%
7.50%
10.64%
6.71%
—

Note: Fee adjusted for mutual funds where applicable.
* 65% S&P 500 Index and 35% Lehman U.S. Long Credit AA or Better Bond Index through February 29, 2000; 65% S&P 500 Index and 35% Bloomberg Barclays U.S. Credit A or Better Bond Index thereafter.
The performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate, so investors' shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data cited.

Quarterly commentary  



Total returns details  






People and process

Firms
Wellington Management Company LLP
Product management
Vanguard Wellington™ Fund uses a conservative approach and emphasizes broad diversification to moderate risk in pursuit of three objectives: long-term capital appreciation, reasonable current income, and capital conservation. The stock/bond mix has provided an “all-weather” portfolio with competitive returns in various market cycles.Equity component: Fundamental research identifies high-quality large- and mid-capitalization companies in out-of-favor industries. These stocks typically offer above-average dividend yields, low valuation multiples, and improving fundamentals.Fixed income component: The advisor builds an intermediate-duration portfolio that may include short-, intermediate-, and long-term investment-grade corporate bonds, with some exposure to U.S. Treasury, government agency, and mortgage-backed securities. A top-down strategy ranks industry groups by valuation, liquidity, and economic outlook. Fundamental credit research seeks to identify stable and improving credits with low default risks.
Firm and manager details  




Sector weightings
as of 06/30/2017
					




 
Sector

 VWENX


Benchmark
Wellington Composite Index
+/- Weight


Financials
24.5%
14.5%
10.0%

Health Care
16.5%
14.5%
2.0%

Information Technology
15.0%
22.3%
– 7.3%

Industrials
11.6%
10.3%
1.3%

Energy
9.0%
6.0%
3.0%

Consumer Staples
7.6%
9.0%
– 1.4%

Consumer Discretionary
6.3%
12.3%
– 6.0%

Utilities
4.0%
3.2%
0.8%

Materials
2.7%
2.9%
– 0.2%

Telecommunication Services
1.5%
2.1%
– 0.6%

Real Estate
1.3%
2.9%
– 1.6%

Other
0.0%
0.0%
0.0%

0%25%

Total

100.0%

100.0%




Sector categories are based on the Global Industry Classification Standard, except for the "Other" category (if applicable), which includes securities that have not been provided a Global Industry Classification Standard as of the effective reporting period.

Sector weighting details  





Distribution by credit quality* (% of fund) as of 06/30/2017



 
Credit rating

 VWENX


U.S. Government
17.2%

Aaa
5.7%

Aa
14.5%

A
44.5%

Baa
18.1%

0%45%
 Total
 100.0%

* Credit-quality ratings are measured on a scale that generally ranges from AAA (highest) to D (lowest). ”NR” is used to classify securities for which a rating is not available. NR securities may include a fund’s investment in Vanguard Market Liquidity Fund or Vanguard Municipal Cash Management Fund, each of which invests in high-quality money market instruments and may serve as a cash management vehicle for the Vanguard funds, trusts, and accounts. U.S. Treasury, U.S. Agency, and U.S. Agency mortgage-backed securities appear under ”U.S. Government.” Credit-quality ratings for each issue are obtained from Barclays using ratings derived from Moody’s Investors Service (Moody’s), Fitch Ratings (Fitch), and Standard & Poor’s (S&P). When ratings from all three agencies are available, the median rating is used. When ratings are available from two of the agencies, the lower rating is used. When one rating is available, that rating is used.
			




Top 10 holdings as of 06/30/2017



Rank
Holding

1
Microsoft Corp.
2
JPMorgan Chase & Co.
3
Bank of America Corp.
4
Comcast Corp.
5
Chevron Corp.
6
Alphabet Inc.
7
Chubb Ltd.
8
Intel Corp.
9
Prudential Financial Inc.
10
Merck & Co. Inc.


Top 10 equals: 16.6% of net assets & 25.7% of net equities


Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.


Holdings policy for this fund  



Holding details  






Asset allocation as of 06/30/2017






Asset class
VWENX

 Stock
64.86%
 Bond
31.71%
 Short-term reserves
3.43%

Total
100.00%



Asset allocation details  








Fundamentals




Balanced –
						as of 06/30/2017
						
VWENX

Benchmark
Wellington Composite Index


Turnover rate
30.9% Fiscal year end 11/2016
N/A


Short-term reserves
3.43%
N/A




Stock –
						as of 06/30/2017
						
VWENX

Benchmark
Wellington Composite Index


Number of stocks
98
—


Avg market cap
$158.1 billion
—


Median market cap
$90.8 billion
—


P/E ratio
19.3x
—


P/B ratio
2.3x
—




Bond
as of 06/30/2017
						
VWENX

Benchmark
Wellington Composite Index


Number of bonds
863
—


Yield to maturity
2.75%
—


Average duration
6.6 (years)
—



Average effective maturity
Average effective maturity (taxable bond funds and balanced funds except Tax-Managed Balanced)Average Effective Maturity is defined as the average length of time until fixed income securities held by a fund reach maturity and are repaid, taking into consideration that an action such as a call or refunding may cause some bonds to be repaid before they mature.Average stated maturity (municipal bond funds and Tax-Managed Balanced)Average stated maturity represents the average of the stated maturity dates for all fixed income securities held by the fund.Average maturity (money market funds only)Average maturity represents the weighted average maturity of the fund's holdings using the date of the next interest rate adjustment for certain adjustable-rate securities held by the fund.
9.6 (years)
—


Average coupon
3.47%
—






Fundamentals details  









Risk and volatility
as of 06/30/2017
				





 
VWENX

Benchmark
Wellington Composite Index


R-squared
N/A
0.97


Beta
N/A
1.00


Alpha
– 0.06
N/A


Standard deviation
6.99%
6.87%


Sharpe ratio
0.94
1.06

Risk and volatility are based on the share class with the earliest inception date.
Risk measures are calculated from trailing 36-month fund returns relative to the associated benchmarks.
The fund is subject to several stock and bond market risks, any of which could cause an investor to lose money. However, because stock and bond prices can move in different directions or to different degrees, the fund’s bond and short-term investment holdings may counteract some of the volatility experienced by the fund’s stock holdings. The fund’s performance could be hurt by: Stock market risk: The chance that stock prices overall will decline. Stock markets tend to move in cycles, with periods of rising stock prices and periods of falling stock prices.Investment style risk: The chance that returns from mid- and large-capitalization stocks will trail returns from the overall stock market. Historically, mid-cap stocks have been more volatile in price than the large-cap stocks that dominate the overall market, and they often perform quite differently. Mid-cap stocks tend to have greater volatility than large-cap stocks because, among other things, medium-size companies are more sensitive to changing economic conditions.Interest rate risk: The chance that bond prices will decline because of rising interest rates.Income risk: The chance that the fund’s income will decline because of falling interest rates.Credit risk: The chance that a bond issuer will fail to pay interest or principal in a timely manner or that negative perceptions of the issuer’s ability to make such payments will cause the price of that bond to decline. Credit risk should be low for the fund because it purchases only bonds that are of investment-grade quality.Call risk: The chance that during periods of falling interest rates, issuers of callable bonds may call (redeem) securities with higher coupon rates or interest rates before their maturity dates. The fund would then lose any price appreciation above the bond’s call price and would be forced to reinvest the unanticipated proceeds at lower interest rates, resulting in a decline in the fund’s income.Manager risk: The chance that poor security selection will cause the fund to underperform relevant benchmarks or other funds with a similar investment objective.



Risk and volatility details  

















MORE ON INVESTMENTS









Money Market Reform












LITERATURE
Fact sheet (06/30/2017)

Investment profile (06/30/2017)  

Summary prospectus

Investment commentary (06/30/2017)  


Statutory prospectus

Annual report (11/30/2016)

Semiannual report (05/31/2017)

Statement of additional information
More





TOOLS
Custom investment reporting


My investment list  











Also of interest

07/26/2017 | ArticleVanguard files for 2 global balanced funds


05/26/2017 | Article2016–2017 expense ratio update cycle concludes


04/28/2017 | ArticleVanguard reports April 2017 expense ratio changes






SUBSCRIBE TO INSIGHTS

  Research, commentary & news delivered directly to your inbox





















































 Vanguard - Product overview - GNMA Fund Admiral Shares













































































Your input was invalid

























Fact sheet (06/30/2017)A brief product description that includes information on performance, cost, industry weightings, top holdings, investment approach, and portfolio attributes. Updated quarterly.



  Download



















Summary prospectusA simplified, standardized version of a statutory prospectus. Includes discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance intended to make it easier to compare all mutual funds regardless of provider. Updated annually.



  Download


























Statutory prospectusIncludes detailed discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance. By law, a prospectus must be provided to a potential investor before he or she can invest. Updated annually.



  Download


























Statement of additional informationA document provided as a supplement to a mutual fund prospectus. It contains more detailed information about fund policies, operations, and risks. Updated annually.



  Download



















Investment profile (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, quarterly commentary on investment performance, and detailed discussion on the management team and investment process. Updated quarterly.



  Download



















Investment commentary (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including description, style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, and brief quarterly commentary on investment performance. Updated quarterly.



  Download



















Semiannual report (07/31/2016)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated semiannually.



  Download



















Annual report (01/31/2017)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated annually.



  Download














VANGUARD PRODUCTS




















 ETFs 
 Mutual Funds 
 All 




{{assetClass.name}} 









{{subAssetClass}}





Data is temporarily unavailable. For assistance, please call 800-997-2798 Monday throughy Friday from 8:30 a.m. to 7 p.m., Eastern time. 


{{fund.profile.longNm | trimFundName}}  {{fund.profile.ticker}}








Vanguard portfolio holdings disclaimerPortfolio holdings information:Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the percentage of the fund's total assets that each of these holdings represents as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 15 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month).Vanguard may also publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the aggregate percentage that these holdings represent of the fund's total net assets and equities, as of the most recent month-end, ten business days after the end of the month.Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, a detailed list of the securities (aggregated by issuer for money market funds) held in a Vanguard fund (portfolio holdings) as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 30 days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard Market Neutral Fund (60 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter), Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month), and Vanguard Money Market Funds (within five [5] business days after the last business day of the preceding month). Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, Vanguard may exclude any portion of these portfolio holdings from publication on this Site when deemed in the best interest of the fund.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on a delayed basis and will not necessarily represent all of the actual investments held by the relevant Vanguard fund.Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.The following additional terms and conditions apply to the publication on this Site of any Vanguard fund's portfolio holdings as described above:By accessing the portfolio holdings, you agree not to reproduce, distribute, or disseminate the portfolio holdings, in whole or in part, in any form without prior written permission of Vanguard.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on an "as is" basis, and Vanguard makes no express or implied warranties or representations with respect to the accuracy, completeness, reliability, or fitness of the portfolio holdings or any financial results you may achieve from their use.In no event shall Vanguard or its affiliates have any liability relating to the use of the portfolio holdings.






Vanguard share class options






StyleboxThe stylebox gives information about a fund’s investment style in visual form.For equity funds, a stylebox’s rows and columns indicate market capitalization (small, mid, large) and investment style (value, blend, growth); for fixed income funds, its rows and columns indicate credit quality and/or duration (short, medium, long).Two important things about a fund are shown in its stylebox:Central tendency. The fund’s central tendency reflects the aggregate characteristics resulting from the fund’s approach to security selection. Because it is based on an analysis of the performance characteristics of the fund’s potential holdings over long periods, the central tendency is expected to be relatively stable. In the stylebox, it is shown as a dot within the shaded oval.Expected range. Within the fund’s universe of potential holdings, and depending on the fund’s investment approach, some categories of investments will be owned more frequently; together, they are known as the expected range. In the stylebox, the expected range of frequently owned categories is represented by a shaded oval.Note: Styleboxes for  fixed income funds uses duration rather than average weighted maturity. Duration is a more accurate measure of interest rate sensitivity because it takes into consideration all mortgage prepayments, puts, and adjustable coupons.






 









Log on 

You're attempting to access a secure area. Please log on below.


You're attempting to access a secure area.Please log on below.



















Remember me





Need logon help?




Register for access



Need logon help?



Not registered?

Get more with full site accessAdditional tools from VanguardAdvisor-only materialsResources for your practiceFund commentary/analysis


Register for access



Not registered?

Register today for access to additional tools from Vanguard and Morningstar, resources for your practice, advisor-only materials, fund commentary/analysis, and more.

Register for access


















GNMA Fund Admiral Shares (VFIJX)




Also available in more share classes.



Indexed to BloomBarc US GNMA Index  Fact sheet (06/30/2017)








Overview  

 Overview 
 Performance 
 Portfolio 
 Price & Distributions











Summary of this fundVanguard GNMA Fund seeks to provide a moderate level of current income. 




Investment approachMortgage-backed securities.Invests in a broad range of GNMA security types.Seeks moderate and sustainable current income.Actively managed, fundamental research approach.
View more details



PRICE AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Price and distributions
as of 07/28/2017






NAVFor funds with a fluctuating price per share, the net asset value (NAV) is the market value of a mutual fund's total assets, minus liabilities, divided by the number of shares outstanding. The value of a single share is called its share value or share price.For money market funds that seek to maintain a stable price per share, the NAV is calculated by valuing securities at amortized cost, which approximates market value.
Change $/%



$10.54







$0.01
					
  
					0.09%





SEC yield
A non-money market fund's SEC yield is based on a formula mandated by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) that calculates a fund's hypothetical annualized income, as a percentage of its assets. A security's income, for the purposes of this calculation, is based on the current market yield to maturity (in the case of bonds) or projected dividend yield (for stocks) of the fund's holdings over a trailing 30 day period. This hypothetical income will differ (at times, significantly) from the fund's actual experience; as a result, income distributions from the fund may be higher or lower than implied by the SEC yield.The SEC yield for a money market fund is calculated by annualizing its daily income distributions for the previous seven days.


2.73%
J
BASED ON HOLDINGS' ACTUAL INCOME FOR THE PRIOR 30 DAYS;DISTRIBUTION MAY DIFFER





Distribution yield
The fund's current monthly income dividend per share, annualized (by dividing by the number of days in the month and multiplying by 365) as a percentage of the fund's average NAV during the month. as of 06/30/2017
					


2.88%




KEY FUND FACTS
Key fund facts




Expense ratio


0.11% as of 05/26/2017




Lipper peer average
expense ratio


0.896% as of 12/31/2016



Designation


Intermediate Government




Inception on


02/12/2001




Earliest share class
inception on


06/27/1980




Total net assets
This represents the total net assets for all share classes of Vanguard's U.S. funds that share the same investment strategy, management and holdings, but does not include any collective trusts sharing the same investment mandate.


$25.0 billion as of 06/30/2017



Net assets for
						VFIJX 


$17.2 billion as of 06/30/2017



Holdings 


43 as of 06/30/2017



Management style


Active


Benchmark


BloomBarc US GNMA Index



Turnover rate 


 925.80%(Fiscal year-end  01/31/2017)


CUSIP


922031794





Fees and minimums
Fees and minimums




Purchase fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor buys shares. This fee is not a sales charge or load because it is paid directly to the fund to offset the costs of trading certain securities.


None



Redemption fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor sells shares. A redemption fee differs from a back-end load because the money is paid back into the fund. Many funds charge redemption fees only when shares are bought and then sold within a specific period of time, generally in an effort to discourage market-timing and short-term trading. Some brokers also charge their clients redemption fees for the sale of securities.


None


Minimum investment:


N/A



Large transaction policy
Large transactions may require notification






Large transaction policy  





STYLEBOX
Stylebox
Fixed incomePortfolio of GNMA mortgage-backed securities.



Central tendency

Expected range


How to read our stylebox  







ObjectiveVanguard GNMA Fund seeks to provide a moderate level of current income. 



Investment approachMortgage-backed securities.Invests in a broad range of GNMA security types.Seeks moderate and sustainable current income.Actively managed, fundamental research approach.



Total returns

as of 06/30/2017






View as:








Quarter‑end

Month‑end





as of 06/30/2017








View as:Quarter‑end Quarter‑endMonth‑end













5%43210-1%     



 
YTD
1 year
5 year
10 year
Since
inception
02/12/2001





NAV 
						

1.12%
0.00%
1.96%
4.51%
4.66%






Benchmark
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. GNMA Bond Index*
						

0.89%
– 0.20%
1.66%
4.35%
—


Note: Fee adjusted for mutual funds where applicable.
* Includes mortgage-backed pass-through securities of the Government National Mortgage Association; these securities are based on pools of 15- and 30-year fixed-rate home mortgages.
The performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate, so investors' shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data cited.

Quarterly commentary  



Total returns details  






People and process

Firms
Wellington Management Company LLP
Product management
Vanguard GNMA Fund seeks a moderate and sustainable level of current income by investing at least 80% of its assets in Government National Mortgage Association (GNMA) pass-through certificates, which are fixed income securities representing part ownership in a pool of mortgage loans backed by the U.S. government. The investment advisor, Wellington Management Company LLP, seeks to maintain a high yield and predictable income stream by selecting securities with strong relative value among the broad range of available securities, and by appropriately positioning the fund in changing economic environments.
Firm and manager details  




Distribution by credit quality* (% of fund) as of 06/30/2017

(% of fund) as of 06/30/2017




 
Credit rating

 VFIJX


U.S. Government
99.3%

Aaa
0.8%

Cash
– 0.1%

0%100%
 Total
 100.0%

* Credit-quality ratings are measured on a scale that generally ranges from AAA (highest) to D (lowest). ”NR” is used to classify securities for which a rating is not available. NR securities may include a fund’s investment in Vanguard Market Liquidity Fund or Vanguard Municipal Cash Management Fund, each of which invests in high-quality money market instruments and may serve as a cash management vehicle for the Vanguard funds, trusts, and accounts. U.S. Treasury, U.S. Agency, and U.S. Agency mortgage-backed securities appear under ”U.S. Government.” Credit-quality ratings for each issue are obtained from Barclays using ratings derived from Moody’s Investors Service (Moody’s), Fitch Ratings (Fitch), and Standard & Poor’s (S&P). When ratings from all three agencies are available, the median rating is used. When ratings are available from two of the agencies, the lower rating is used. When one rating is available, that rating is used.
		


Distribution by coupon
as of 06/30/2017
				

as of 06/30/2017
			



 
Coupon rate

 VFIJX


Below 5.0%
89.5%

5.0% to 6.0%
7.6%

6.0% to 7.0%
2.5%

>= 7.0
0.4%

0%90%
 Total
 100.0%





Fundamentals




Fixed income –
						as of 06/30/2017

VFIJX

Benchmark
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. GNMA Bond Index


Number of bonds
43
89


Yield to maturity
2.86%
2.84%


Short-term reserves
0.00%
N/A


Average duration
4.7 (years)
4.7 (years)



Average effective maturity
Average effective maturity (taxable bond funds and balanced funds except Tax-Managed Balanced)Average Effective Maturity is defined as the average length of time until fixed income securities held by a fund reach maturity and are repaid, taking into consideration that an action such as a call or refunding may cause some bonds to be repaid before they mature.Average stated maturity (municipal bond funds and Tax-Managed Balanced)Average stated maturity represents the average of the stated maturity dates for all fixed income securities held by the fund.Average maturity (money market funds only)Average maturity represents the weighted average maturity of the fund's holdings using the date of the next interest rate adjustment for certain adjustable-rate securities held by the fund.
7.2 (years)
6.9 (years)


Average coupon
3.62%
3.57%






Fundamentals details  







Risk and volatility
as of 06/30/2017
				

as of 06/30/2017
			




 
VFIJX

Benchmark
Bloomberg Barclays U.S. GNMA Bond Index


R-squared
N/A
0.97


Beta
N/A
1.09


Alpha
0.01
N/A


Standard deviation
1.91%
1.73%


Sharpe ratio
1.01
0.97

Risk and volatility are based on the share class with the earliest inception date.
Risk measures are calculated from trailing 36-month fund returns relative to the associated benchmarks.
An investment in the fund could lose money over short or even long periods. You should expect the fund’s share price and total return to fluctuate within a wide range, like the fluctuations of the overall bond market. The fund’s performance could be hurt by:Prepayment risk: The chance that during periods of falling interest rates, homeowners will refinance their mortgages before their maturity dates, resulting in prepayment of mortgage-backed securities held by the fund. The fund would then lose any price appreciation above the mortgage’s principal and would be forced to reinvest the unanticipated proceeds at lower interest rates, resulting in a decline in the fund’s income. Prepayment risk is high for the fund.Income risk: The chance that the fund’s income will decline because of falling interest rates.Extension risk: The chance that during periods of rising interest rates, homeowners will prepay their mortgages at slower rates. This will lengthen the duration or average life of mortgage-backed securities held by the fund and delay the fund’s ability to reinvest proceeds at higher interest rates. Extension risk is high for the fund.Interest rate risk: The chance that bond prices will decline because of rising interest rates. In addition, when interest rates decline, GNMA prices typically do not rise as much as the prices of comparable bonds. This is because the market tends to discount GNMA prices for prepayment risk when interest rates decline. Interest rate risk should be moderate for the fund.Manager risk: The chance that poor security selection will cause the fund to underperform relevant benchmarks or other funds with a similar investment objective.



Risk and volatility details  














LITERATURE


Fact sheet (06/30/2017)



Fact sheet (06/30/2017)




Summary prospectus



Summary prospectus





Statutory prospectus



Statutory prospectus




Statement of additional information



Statement of additional information




Investment profile (06/30/2017)  



Investment profile (06/30/2017)  




Investment commentary (06/30/2017)  



Investment commentary (06/30/2017)  




Semiannual report (07/31/2016)



Semiannual report (07/31/2016)




Annual report (01/31/2017)



Annual report (01/31/2017)

More





TOOLS
Compare products


My product list  


View all tools  





RESEARCH

04/28/2017 | ArticleLower expense ratios for the world's largest stock and bond funds


07/28/2017 | ArticleRisk speedometer: An acceleration abroad


07/26/2017 | ArticleVanguard files for 2 global balanced funds


07/25/2017 | ArticleSettlement cycle shortened, will reduce risk to investors


07/24/2017 | ArticleVanguard Target Retirement 2010 products complete merger






















































 Vanguard - Product overview - Windsor Fund Admiral













































































Your input was invalid

























Fact sheet (06/30/2017)A brief product description that includes information on performance, cost, industry weightings, top holdings, investment approach, and portfolio attributes. Updated quarterly.



  Download



















Summary prospectusA simplified, standardized version of a statutory prospectus. Includes discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance intended to make it easier to compare all mutual funds regardless of provider. Updated annually.



  Download


























Statutory prospectusIncludes detailed discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance. By law, a prospectus must be provided to a potential investor before he or she can invest. Updated annually.



  Download


























Statement of additional informationA document provided as a supplement to a mutual fund prospectus. It contains more detailed information about fund policies, operations, and risks. Updated annually.



  Download



















Investment profile (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, quarterly commentary on investment performance, and detailed discussion on the management team and investment process. Updated quarterly.



  Download



















Investment commentary (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including description, style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, and brief quarterly commentary on investment performance. Updated quarterly.



  Download



















Semiannual report (04/30/2017)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated semiannually.



  Download



















Annual report (10/31/2016)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated annually.



  Download














VANGUARD PRODUCTS




















 ETFs 
 Mutual Funds 
 All 




{{assetClass.name}} 









{{subAssetClass}}





Data is temporarily unavailable. For assistance, please call 800-997-2798 Monday throughy Friday from 8:30 a.m. to 7 p.m., Eastern time. 


{{fund.profile.longNm | trimFundName}}  {{fund.profile.ticker}}








Vanguard portfolio holdings disclaimerPortfolio holdings information:Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the percentage of the fund's total assets that each of these holdings represents as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 15 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month).Vanguard may also publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the aggregate percentage that these holdings represent of the fund's total net assets and equities, as of the most recent month-end, ten business days after the end of the month.Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, a detailed list of the securities (aggregated by issuer for money market funds) held in a Vanguard fund (portfolio holdings) as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 30 days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard Market Neutral Fund (60 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter), Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month), and Vanguard Money Market Funds (within five [5] business days after the last business day of the preceding month). Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, Vanguard may exclude any portion of these portfolio holdings from publication on this Site when deemed in the best interest of the fund.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on a delayed basis and will not necessarily represent all of the actual investments held by the relevant Vanguard fund.Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.The following additional terms and conditions apply to the publication on this Site of any Vanguard fund's portfolio holdings as described above:By accessing the portfolio holdings, you agree not to reproduce, distribute, or disseminate the portfolio holdings, in whole or in part, in any form without prior written permission of Vanguard.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on an "as is" basis, and Vanguard makes no express or implied warranties or representations with respect to the accuracy, completeness, reliability, or fitness of the portfolio holdings or any financial results you may achieve from their use.In no event shall Vanguard or its affiliates have any liability relating to the use of the portfolio holdings.






Vanguard share class options






StyleboxThe stylebox gives information about a fund’s investment style in visual form.For equity funds, a stylebox’s rows and columns indicate market capitalization (small, mid, large) and investment style (value, blend, growth); for fixed income funds, its rows and columns indicate credit quality and/or duration (short, medium, long).Two important things about a fund are shown in its stylebox:Central tendency. The fund’s central tendency reflects the aggregate characteristics resulting from the fund’s approach to security selection. Because it is based on an analysis of the performance characteristics of the fund’s potential holdings over long periods, the central tendency is expected to be relatively stable. In the stylebox, it is shown as a dot within the shaded oval.Expected range. Within the fund’s universe of potential holdings, and depending on the fund’s investment approach, some categories of investments will be owned more frequently; together, they are known as the expected range. In the stylebox, the expected range of frequently owned categories is represented by a shaded oval.Note: Styleboxes for  fixed income funds uses duration rather than average weighted maturity. Duration is a more accurate measure of interest rate sensitivity because it takes into consideration all mortgage prepayments, puts, and adjustable coupons.






 









Log on 

You're attempting to access a secure area. Please log on below.


You're attempting to access a secure area.Please log on below.



















Remember me





Need logon help?




Register for access



Need logon help?



Not registered?

Get more with full site accessAdditional tools from VanguardAdvisor-only materialsResources for your practiceFund commentary/analysis


Register for access



Not registered?

Register today for access to additional tools from Vanguard and Morningstar, resources for your practice, advisor-only materials, fund commentary/analysis, and more.

Register for access


















Windsor Fund Admiral Shares (VWNEX)




Also available in more share classes.



Indexed to Russell 1000 Value Index  Fact sheet (06/30/2017)








Overview  

 Overview 
 Performance 
 Portfolio 
 Price & Distributions











Summary of this fundVanguard Windsor™ Fund seeks to provide long-term capital appreciation and income.




Investment approachLarge- and mid-cap value equity.Seeks long-term capital appreciation and growth of income.Diversified, multimanager structure.Fundamental research approach.Opportunistic, contrarian stock selection style.



About the benchmark
The Russell 1000 Value Index measures the performance of the large-cap value segment of the U.S. equity universe.It includes those Russell 1000 companies with lower price-to-book ratios and lower expected and historical growth rates.
View more details



PRICE AND DISTRIBUTIONS
Price and distributions
as of 07/28/2017






NAVFor funds with a fluctuating price per share, the net asset value (NAV) is the market value of a mutual fund's total assets, minus liabilities, divided by the number of shares outstanding. The value of a single share is called its share value or share price.For money market funds that seek to maintain a stable price per share, the NAV is calculated by valuing securities at amortized cost, which approximates market value.
Change $/%



$75.98






– $0.07
					
  
					– 0.09%






SEC yield
A non-money market fund's SEC yield is based on a formula mandated by the Securities and Exchange Commission (SEC) that calculates a fund's hypothetical annualized income, as a percentage of its assets. A security's income, for the purposes of this calculation, is based on the current market yield to maturity (in the case of bonds) or projected dividend yield (for stocks) of the fund's holdings over a trailing 30 day period. This hypothetical income will differ (at times, significantly) from the fund's actual experience; as a result, income distributions from the fund may be higher or lower than implied by the SEC yield.The SEC yield for a money market fund is calculated by annualizing its daily income distributions for the previous seven days.


1.75%
B
BASED ON HOLDINGS' YIELD TO MATURITY/DIVIDEND FOR LAST 30 DAYS OF PRIOR MONTH






Dividend yieldThe annual rate of return on a share of stock, determined by dividing the annual dividend by its current share price. In a stock mutual fund, this figure represents the average dividend yield of the stocks held by the fund.



1.89%



KEY FUND FACTS
Key fund facts




Expense ratio


0.20% as of 02/23/2017




Lipper peer average
expense ratio


1.102% as of 12/31/2016



Designation


Domestic Large Value




Inception on


11/12/2001




Earliest share class
inception on


10/23/1958




Total net assets
This represents the total net assets for all share classes of Vanguard's U.S. funds that share the same investment strategy, management and holdings, but does not include any collective trusts sharing the same investment mandate.


$18.7 billion as of 06/30/2017



Net assets for
						VWNEX 


$13.4 billion as of 06/30/2017



Holdings 


140 as of 06/30/2017



Management style


Active


Benchmark


Russell 1000 Value Index (RU10VATR)



Turnover rate 


 26.10%(Fiscal year-end  10/31/2016)


CUSIP


922018403





Fees and minimums
Fees and minimums




Purchase fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor buys shares. This fee is not a sales charge or load because it is paid directly to the fund to offset the costs of trading certain securities.


None



Redemption fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor sells shares. A redemption fee differs from a back-end load because the money is paid back into the fund. Many funds charge redemption fees only when shares are bought and then sold within a specific period of time, generally in an effort to discourage market-timing and short-term trading. Some brokers also charge their clients redemption fees for the sale of securities.


None


Minimum investment:


N/A



Large transaction policy
Large transactions may require notification






Large transaction policy  





STYLEBOX
Stylebox
EquityPortfolio emphasizing large- and mid-capitalization value stocks.



Central tendency

Expected range


How to read our stylebox  







ObjectiveVanguard Windsor™ Fund seeks to provide long-term capital appreciation and income.



Investment approachLarge- and mid-cap value equity.Seeks long-term capital appreciation and growth of income.Diversified, multimanager structure.Fundamental research approach.Opportunistic, contrarian stock selection style.



About the benchmark
The Russell 1000 Value Index measures the performance of the large-cap value segment of the U.S. equity universe.It includes those Russell 1000 companies with lower price-to-book ratios and lower expected and historical growth rates.



Total returns

as of 06/30/2017






View as:








Quarter‑end

Month‑end





as of 06/30/2017








View as:Quarter‑end Quarter‑endMonth‑end













25%20151050%     



 
YTD
1 year
5 year
10 year
Since
inception
11/12/2001





NAV 
						

8.80%
23.22%
14.90%
5.69%
7.42%






Benchmark
Russell 1000 Value Index*
						

4.66%
15.53%
13.94%
5.57%
—


Note: Fee adjusted for mutual funds where applicable.
* Measures the performance of those Russell 1000 companies with lower price/book ratios and lower predicted and historical growth rates.
The performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate, so investors' shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data cited.

Quarterly commentary  



Total returns details  






People and process

Firms
Wellington Management Company LLPPzena Investment Management, LLC
Product management
Vanguard Windsor™ Fund seeks long-term capital appreciation and income by investing in mid- and large-capitalization value stocks, using a multimanager structure that provides diversification and mitigates risk. The fund’s two investment advisors employ intensive fundamental research and strict valuation disciplines to construct portfolios of undervalued and out-of-favor stocks. The combination of two distinctly different approaches to valuation, stock selection, and portfolio construction enhances diversification while maintaining the fund’s value character. In addition, Vanguard may invest the fund’s cash flows in equity index futures and/or exchange-traded funds to manage liquidity needs while ensuring that the fund remains fully invested.
Firm and manager details  





Sector weightings









 
Sector

 VWNEX
as of 06/30/2017



Benchmark
Russell 1000 Value Index
as of 03/31/2017



Financials
25.2%
26.5%

Information Technology
17.8%
10.0%

Health Care
13.0%
10.8%

Consumer Discretionary
11.2%
4.5%

Industrials
9.0%
10.2%

Energy
8.5%
12.2%

Consumer Staples
4.6%
8.5%

Materials
3.4%
2.9%

Real Estate
3.4%
4.6%

Utilities
2.9%
6.2%

Telecommunication Services
1.0%
3.6%

Other
0.0%
0.0%

0%30%

Total

100.0%

100.0%




Sector categories are based on the Global Industry Classification Standard, except for the "Other" category (if applicable), which includes securities that have not been provided a Global Industry Classification Standard as of the effective reporting period.

Sector weighting details  






Top 10 holdings as of 06/30/2017

 as of 06/30/2017




Rank
Holding

1
Bank of America Corp.
2
Citigroup Inc.
3
American International Group Inc.
4
XL Group Ltd.
5
Bristol-Myers Squibb Co.
6
MetLife Inc.
7
Broadcom Ltd.
8
Arrow Electronics Inc.
9
QUALCOMM Inc.
10
Medtronic plc


Top 10 equals 18.0% of net assets


Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.


Holdings policy for this fund  




Holding details  






Fundamentals




Equity –
						as of 06/30/2017

VWNEX

Benchmark
Russell 1000 Value Index


Number of equity
140
719


Median market cap
$33.8 billion
$65.5 billion


P/E ratio
19.1x
18.2x


P/B ratio
2.0x
2.0x


Turnover rate
26.1% Fiscal year end 10/2016
N/A






Fundamentals details  







Risk and volatility
as of 06/30/2017
				

as of 06/30/2017
			




 
VWNEX

Benchmark
Russell 1000 Value Index


R-squared
N/A
0.93


Beta
N/A
1.14


Alpha
– 0.12
N/A


Standard deviation
12.44%
10.53%


Sharpe ratio
0.52
0.68

Risk and volatility are based on the share class with the earliest inception date.
Risk measures are calculated from trailing 36-month fund returns relative to the associated benchmarks.
An investment in the fund could lose money over short or even long periods. You should expect the fund’s share price and total return to fluctuate within a wide range, like the fluctuations of the overall stock market. The fund’s performance could be hurt by: Stock market risk: The chance that stock prices overall will decline. Stock markets tend to move in cycles, with periods of rising stock prices and periods of falling stock prices.Investment style risk: The chance that returns from mid- and large-capitalization value stocks will trail returns from the overall stock market. Historically, mid-cap stocks have been more volatile in price than the large-cap stocks that dominate the overall market, and they often perform quite differently. Mid-cap stocks tend to have greater volatility than large-cap stocks because, among other things, medium-size companies are more sensitive to changing economic conditions.Manager risk: The chance that poor security selection will cause the fund to underperform relevant benchmarks or other funds with a similar investment objective.



Risk and volatility details  














LITERATURE


Fact sheet (06/30/2017)



Fact sheet (06/30/2017)




Summary prospectus



Summary prospectus





Statutory prospectus



Statutory prospectus




Statement of additional information



Statement of additional information




Investment profile (06/30/2017)  



Investment profile (06/30/2017)  




Investment commentary (06/30/2017)  



Investment commentary (06/30/2017)  




Semiannual report (04/30/2017)



Semiannual report (04/30/2017)




Annual report (10/31/2016)



Annual report (10/31/2016)

More





TOOLS
Compare products


My product list  


View all tools  





RESEARCH

07/28/2017 | ArticleRisk speedometer: An acceleration abroad


07/06/2017 | ArticleAn inside look at Vanguard's Investment Management Group


06/26/2017 | ArticlePerformance vs. cost: Your clients don't have to choose


06/22/2017 | ArticleRisk speedometer: Pumping the brakes


06/19/2017 | ArticleAn analysis of dividend-oriented equity strategies














































 Vanguard - Product overview - Energy Fund Admiral

















































































Your input was invalid

























Fact sheet (06/30/2017)A brief product description that includes information on performance, cost, industry weightings, top holdings, investment approach, and portfolio attributes. Updated quarterly.



  Download















Summary prospectusA simplified, standardized version of a statutory prospectus. Includes discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance intended to make it easier to compare all mutual funds regardless of provider. Updated annually.



  Download















Investment commentary (06/30/2017)A detailed product overview including description, style view, returns, holdings, characteristics, and brief quarterly commentary on investment performance. Updated quarterly.



  Download
  















Statutory prospectusIncludes detailed discussions of investment objectives and policies, risks, costs, and past performance. By law, a prospectus must be provided to a potential investor before he or she can invest. Updated annually.



  Download















Annual report (01/31/2017)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated annually.



  Download















Semiannual report (07/31/2016)A financial statement that lists assets (such as securities holdings), liabilities, and earnings, as well as certain historical information. Updated semiannually.



  Download















Statement of additional informationA document provided as a supplement to a mutual fund prospectus. It contains more detailed information about fund policies, operations, and risks. Updated annually.



  Download









Vanguard portfolio holdings disclaimerPortfolio holdings information:Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the percentage of the fund's total assets that each of these holdings represents as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 15 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month).Vanguard may also publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, the ten largest stock portfolio holdings of a Vanguard fund, and the aggregate percentage that these holdings represent of the fund's total net assets and equities, as of the most recent month-end, ten business days after the end of the month.Vanguard may publish on this Site, in the fund's holdings on the webpages, a detailed list of the securities (aggregated by issuer for money market funds) held in a Vanguard fund (portfolio holdings) as of the most recent calendar-quarter-end, 30 days after the end of the calendar quarter, except for Vanguard Market Neutral Fund (60 calendar days after the end of the calendar quarter), Vanguard index funds (15 calendar days after the end of the month), and Vanguard Money Market Funds (within five [5 business days after the last business day of the preceding month). Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, Vanguard may exclude any portion of these portfolio holdings from publication on this Site when deemed in the best interest of the fund.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on a delayed basis and will not necessarily represent all of the actual investments held by the relevant Vanguard fund.Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.The following additional terms and conditions apply to the publication on this Site of any Vanguard fund's portfolio holdings as described above:By accessing the portfolio holdings, you agree not to reproduce, distribute, or disseminate the portfolio holdings, in whole or in part, in any form without prior written permission of Vanguard.Except with respect to Vanguard Money Market Funds, the portfolio holdings are provided on an "as is" basis, and Vanguard makes no express or implied warranties or representations with respect to the accuracy, completeness, reliability, or fitness of the portfolio holdings or any financial results you may achieve from their use.In no event shall Vanguard or its affiliates have any liability relating to the use of the portfolio holdings.






StyleboxThe stylebox gives information about a fund’s investment style in visual form.For equity funds, a stylebox’s rows and columns indicate market capitalization (small, mid, large) and investment style (value, blend, growth); for bond funds, its rows and columns indicate credit quality and/or duration (short, medium, long).Two important things about a fund are shown in its stylebox:Central tendency. The fund’s central tendency reflects the aggregate characteristics resulting from the fund’s approach to security selection. Because it is based on an analysis of the performance characteristics of the fund’s potential holdings over long periods, the central tendency is expected to be relatively stable. In the stylebox, it is shown as a dot within the shaded oval.Expected range. Within the fund’s universe of potential holdings, and depending on the fund’s investment approach, some categories of investments will be owned more frequently; together, they are known as the expected range. In the stylebox, the expected range of frequently owned categories is represented by a shaded oval.Note: Styleboxes for bond funds uses duration rather than average weighted maturity. Duration is a more accurate measure of interest rate sensitivity because it takes into consideration all mortgage prepayments, puts, and adjustable coupons.






About the optionsFund share classesA fund may offer multiple share classes. The objectives, strategies, and policies for all share classes of a fund are identical. However, expense ratios vary by share class, reflecting the differing costs of providing services to the holders of each share class.Here are some of the key distinctions:Investor SharesTraditional shares for individual investors that typically feature low minimum initial investments.Admiral™ SharesA lower-cost share class generally available without a minimum initial investment requirement to institutional investors and financial intermediary clients. Vanguard created Admiral Shares to recognize and encourage the cost savings stemming from large, long-standing investment accounts and to pass these savings on to the shareholders who generate them.Institutional SharesShares generally available to institutions or other investors with fund account balances of $5 million or more.Institutional Plus SharesShares generally available to institutions or other investors with fund account balances from $100 million to $200 million, depending on the fund.Institutional Select SharesShares generally available to large institutional investors. Fund account minimums range from $3 billion to $5 billion, depending on fund.ETF SharesExchange-traded shares of certain Vanguard index funds, ETF Shares combine the benefits of indexing, such as low costs and broad market diversification, with the trading and pricing flexibility of individual stocks.Vanguard ETF Shares are not redeemable with the issuing Fund other than in very large aggregations worth millions of dollars. Instead, investors must buy and sell Vanguard ETF Shares in the secondary market and hold those shares in a brokerage account. In doing so, the investor may incur brokerage commissions and may pay more than net asset value when buying and receive less than net asset value when selling.Notes:All investing is subject to risk, including the possible loss of the money you invest.  









Energy Fund Admiral Shares (VGELX)






Overview  

 Overview 
 Performance 
 Portfolio 
 Price & Distributions








OPTIONS

as of05/25/2017





Options

Expense ratio
					
Minimum

Admiral
0.33%
N/A
Investor

0.41%
N/A
About our options  







	 	 
	

Fees

•

Purchase fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor buys shares. This fee is not a sales charge or load because it is paid directly to the fund to offset the costs of trading certain securities. None

•

Redemption fee:
A fee charged by some mutual funds when an investor sells shares. A redemption fee differs from a back-end load because the money is paid back into the fund. Many funds charge redemption fees only when shares are bought and then sold within a specific period of time, generally in an effort to discourage market-timing and short-term trading. Some brokers also charge their clients redemption fees for the sale of securities. None




KEY FACTS


•
Product type: Energy
				
•


VGELX inception on 11/12/2001
				

•
Earliest share class inception on 05/23/1984
					

•
$9.1 billion
total net assets
This represents the total net assets for all share classes of Vanguard's U.S. funds, as well as any collective trust that shares the same investment strategy, management and holdings. as of 06/30/2017
					

•
$6.1 billion net assets for
VGELX as of 06/30/2017
				

•
141 holdings as of 06/30/2017
					

•
Benchmarked to the MSCI ACWI Energy
					


•
Turnover rate (Fiscal year-end  01/31/2017) 28.60%
			
•
CUSIP: 921908802
					









Investment approach


Print PDF



Energy sector fund.Multi-cap equity.Seeks long-term capital appreciation.Multimanager structure.


Total returns
as of 06/30/2017






View as:








Quarter‑end

Month‑end






as of 06/30/2017













10%50-5-10-15%     



 
1 year
3 year
5 year
10 year

Since inception
11/12/2001





NAV 
	                        

– 1.00%
– 10.86%
0.55%
– 0.03%
9.01%






Benchmark
Spliced Energy Index*
	                        

0.25%
– 11.38%
– 0.89%
– 1.30%
—

Note: Fee adjusted for mutual funds where applicable.
* S&P 500 Index through November 30, 2000; S&P Energy Sector Index through May 31, 2010; MSCI All Country World Energy Index thereafter.
The performance data shown represent past performance, which is not a guarantee of future results. Investment returns and principal value will fluctuate, so investors' shares, when sold, may be worth more or less than their original cost. Current performance may be lower or higher than the performance data cited.

Quarterly commentary  



Total returns details  






People and process

Firms
Wellington Management Company LLPVanguard Quantitative Equity Group
Product management
Vanguard Energy Fund uses multiple investment advisors, each of which is responsible for managing a portion of the fund’s assets. Each advisor independently selects and maintains a portfolio of common stocks for the fund. In seeking long-term capital appreciation, the advisors invest in a diversified portfolio of stocks broadly representative of the energy sector. The portfolio typically includes large- and mid-capitalization stocks of companies in traditional energy segments, such as oil and natural gas; newer segments, such as geothermal and solar power; and industries associated with energy and related products worldwide.
Firm and manager details  




Top subsectors
as of 06/30/2017
					






Subindustry
VGELX

Benchmark
MSCI All Country World Index Energy
+/- Weight

Integrated Oil & Gas
39.3%
52.5%
– 13.2%
Oil & Gas Exploration & Production
32.0%
18.7%
13.3%
Oil & Gas Equipment & Services
8.6%
7.8%
0.8%
Oil & Gas Refining & Marketing
8.4%
9.3%
– 0.9%
Utilities
4.7%
0.0%
4.7%
Oil & Gas Storage & Transportation
4.5%
10.5%
– 6.0%
Oil & Gas Drilling
1.3%
0.3%
1.0%
Information Technology
0.3%
0.0%
0.3%
Consumer Discretionary
0.2%
0.0%
0.2%
Financials
0.2%
0.0%
0.2%


Top sectors equal

99.5%

of stock

Sector categories are based on the Global Industry Classification Standard, except for the "Other" category (if applicable), which includes securities that have not been provided a Global Industry Classification Standard as of the effective reporting period.

Subsector weightings  







Top 10 holdings as of 06/30/2017



Rank
Holding

1
Exxon Mobil Corp.
2
Chevron Corp.
3
Pioneer Natural Resources Co.
4
Royal Dutch Shell plc
5
TOTAL SA
6
EOG Resources Inc.
7
Schlumberger Ltd.
8
BP plc
9
Valero Energy Corp.
10
Baker Hughes Inc.


Top 10 equals 42.1% of net assets


Portfolio holdings may exclude any temporary cash investments and equity index products.


Holdings policy for this fund  



Holding details  







Fundamentals




Stock –
						as of 06/30/2017
						
VGELX

Benchmark
MSCI All Country World Index Energy


Number of stocks
141
140


Avg market cap
$80.8 billion
$111.7 billion


Median market cap
$37.0 billion
$54.1 billion


P/E ratio
27.2x
23.2x


P/B ratio
1.6x
1.4x


Turnover rate
28.6% Fiscal year end 1/2017
N/A






Fundamentals details  









Risk and volatility
as of 06/30/2017
				





 
VGELX

Benchmark
Spliced Energy Index


R-squared
N/A
0.96


Beta
N/A
1.05


Alpha
0.10
N/A


Standard deviation
19.51%
18.25%


Sharpe ratio
– 0.57
– 0.63

Risk and volatility are based on the share class with the earliest inception date.
Risk measures are calculated from trailing 36-month fund returns relative to the associated benchmarks.
An investment in the fund could lose money over short or even long periods. You should expect the fund’s share price and total return to fluctuate within a wide range, like the fluctuations of the overall stock market. The fund’s performance could be hurt by: Industry concentration risk: The chance that there will be overall problems affecting a particular industry. Because the fund normally invests at least 80% of its assets in one industry, the fund’s performance largely depends—for better or for worse—on the overall condition of this industry.Stock market risk: The chance that stock prices overall will decline. Stock markets tend to move in cycles, with periods of rising prices and periods of falling prices. The fund’s investments in foreign stocks can be riskier than U.S. stock investments. Foreign stocks tend to be more volatile and less liquid than U.S. stocks. The prices of foreign stocks and the prices of U.S. stocks may move in opposite directions.Manager risk: The chance that poor security selection will cause the fund to underperform relevant benchmarks or other funds with a similar investment objective.Country/regional risk: The chance that world events—such as political upheaval, financial troubles, or natural disasters—will adversely affect the value of securities issued by companies in foreign countries or regions. Because the fund may invest a large portion of its assets in securities of companies located in any one country or region, its performance may be hurt disproportionately by the poor performance of its investments in that area. Country/regional risk is especially high in emerging markets.Currency risk: The chance that the value of a foreign investment, measured in U.S. dollars, will decrease because of unfavorable changes in currency exchange rates.



Risk and volatility details  

















MORE ON INVESTMENTS


Money Market Reform



















LITERATURE
Fact sheet (06/30/2017)

Summary prospectus

Investment commentary (06/30/2017)  

Statutory prospectus


Annual report (01/31/2017)

Semiannual report (07/31/2016)

Statement of additional information
More





TOOLS
Custom investment reporting


My investment list  











Also of interest

07/12/2017 | PDFAn analysis of dividend-oriented equity strategies


07/06/2017 | ArticleAn inside look at Vanguard's Investment Management Group


05/26/2017 | Article2016–2017 expense ratio update cycle concludes






SUBSCRIBE TO INSIGHTS

  Research, commentary & news delivered directly to your inbox


























	Search Engine Marketing (SEM) - Bing Ads








































































































Skip to content











Sign upSign in


 


















You run your business. We'll help find your customers.
Bing Ads can help build your business and drive your success. Spend $25 and get $100 in advertising credit.†

†Offer details




Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.







Coupon code class

First name:

Last name:

Email:

Your website URL

Business phone



*Required
Microsoft may contact you to provide updates and special offers about Bing Ads. You can unsubscribe at any time. To learn more you can read the privacy statement.
Type the code from the image:

Enter security code:







             























×
Get $100 in search advertising when you spend $25 in Bing Ads.


†Offer Details: Offer expires December 31, 2017.  Valid only for new Bing Ads customers who are first party recipients of the offer email. A new Bing Ads customer is one that has not advertised on Bing Ads before. Enter promotional coupon code and spend $25 (applies to threshold and prepaid accounts) to receive $100 in Bing Ads credits. Limit one promotion code per new Bing Ads customer. Promotional code must be redeemed within thirty (30) days of Bing Ads new customer account creation. Ad campaign costs accrued before receiving a credit, as well as costs accrued after all credits are used, will be charged to the payment method associated with the Bing Ads account. If customer payment fails, the coupon amount will not be applied.  Ads will continue to run and accrue costs after any promotional credit has been used up. Any portion of the credit not used within ninety (90) days of credit redemption will expire and can't be carried over even if the Bing Ads Customer switches their payment method. Offer valid only to residents of the United States. In order for the offer to be valid, a form of payment must be entered into your account prior to redemption of the promotional code and prior to your account going live to take advantage of the credit. This offer may not be combined with any other offer, promotional code coupon or discount, separated, redeemed for cash, transferred, sold, or bartered. Microsoft, in its sole discretion, can close your account for any suspected coupon abuse. Refund of the $25 is not permitted.  See Bing Ads Terms and Conditions for more details at sign-up. Other terms and conditions may apply.  Microsoft reserves the right to cancel, change, or suspend this offer at any time without notice.









See how Bing Ads works



Customers search


Customers see your ad


Customers contact you


Watch how Bing Ads works  
 








×
How Bing Ads works

















Help more customers find you
See how Bing can attract customers your Google AdWords campaigns can't.

Reach 137 million searchers on the Bing Network.1
Tap into 32.9% of the search marketplace.2
Get in front of searchers who spend 16 percent more than the average internet searcher.2











Powerful network. Powerful benefits.



Reach across devicesConnect with customers looking for your business anytime, anywhere, on any device.


Go global or localReach people in the Bing Network everywhere or focus on cities, counties and areas within a certain distance from your business.


Easy to importIf you're already using another product like Google Adwords, it's easy to pull that campaign into Bing Ads.








You control your costs

 Free sign-upJoin Bing Ads for free and control your account at every step.


 Only pay for clicksPay just when customers click on your ad. No click, no charge.


 No minimum feeStart advertising with a budget that works best for your business.









 



The advantage we gain in cost per click gives us a great return on investment — more than 35 percent better than Google AdWords.
Scott Redgate, search engine marketing manager — CJ Pony Parts
By using Bing Ads features like Image Extensions and Sitelink Extensions, this auto parts retailer races to convert customers and beat its competition.

 Read about driving more conversions







 



We might not get as much of the volume as with Google AdWords, but the volume of the traffic that we get converts really well at a lower cost.
Scott Schult, Executive Vice President of Marketing — Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau
The Myrtle Beach Area Convention and Visitors Bureau uses Bing Ads to drive site traffic and tourism at lower cost.

 Read about getting better ROI








Better results for less cost. That's as simple as I can make it. If I look at the quality of the traffic we get for the dollars we spend on Bing Ads, our ROI is fantastic.
Alex Littlewood, CEO   Motoroso
Motoroso, a market network for auto enthusiasts, gets better results for less cost and reaches a high-value audience with Bing Ads.

 Read about attracting quality traffic



 









Import your AdWords campaigns

Save time by importing your Google AdWords campaigns into Bing Ads to get ads live quickly.


Sign in with your Microsoft account (or create one) to get started on Bing Ads.


From within the Bing Ads interface, select the Import from Google AdWords option.


Enter your Google AdWords credentials and select the campaign you want to import.










Preview your ad

Get found online with search engine marketing. Make the most of your marketing dollars and drive customers to your business.
See how Bing Ads can work for you




















Get started today
Give us a few details about your business to create a Bing Ads account and get it up and running.


  
Sign up
Get started with Bing Ads 
Signing up is always free.













FAQ


Is Bing Ads right for me?

Is Bing Ads right for my business?
All types of businesses find value and success with Bing Ads. Whether you're focused on local calls and foot traffic, or want to drive traffic to your website from across the country or around the world. Bing Ads has solutions for you.
I already appear in search results for free. Why should I pay for advertising?
Your current customers may search for your business by name, aiming it easy to find you in search results. But customers you've yet to reach are more likely searching for general terms that wouldn't necessarily bring up your business in search results. Advertising next to relevant Bing search results puts your business front and center with interested customers you otherwise might not reach.
What is the difference between SEO and SEM? Which one is right for me?
Search engine optimization (SEO) is adjusting your website to improve your natural ranking in search results. You cannot pay to improve your website ranking on Bing or Yahoo, thus we often refer to these results and unpaid or "organic" search results.

	Clicks from SEO are free. But SEO also requires technical expertise and involves some factors over which you have only limited control.

	Search engine marketing (SEM) is paid advertising that appears next to or above unpaid (or "organic") search results. These paid ads are purchased through Bing Ads.

	You pay for SEM clicks. But SEM gives you more control over when your website appears on results pages and you decide how much you want to pay. And you can measure which ads are working and quickly improve your results.

	You don't have to choose between SEO and SEM. You can do both!
If my time is limited, should I still try Bing ads?
Yes! Call a Bing Ads specialist at 877-635-3561*and we’ll set up your first campaign for you for free. We’ll give you tips on getting the most out of your ads and set you up for success. We’re here to help.




About Bing Ads

Where does my ad appear?
Your ads could appear on the top or to the right of Bing, Yahoo, and MSN search results. And you can choose to target your ads to different geographic regions, times or days of the week, and even demographics.
What determines my ad position?
Bing Ads is a pay-per-click (PPC) advertising system. You bid based on how much you are willing to pay per each click on your ad. Because webpages have a limited number of places to show ads, we auction those spaces. You are bidding against other advertisers to get your ads into the space you want. So if you bid on the keyword "shoe", you will have to beat the bids of the other advertisers who are also bidding on "shoe." You determine how much you are willing to bid.
	Your ad position is based on several things, including:
	
How closely your ad and website fit with the terms that are searched (relevance).
How your bid compares to other bids in the Bing Ads auction.
How strongly your ad has performed in the past and how often it has been clicked (click-through rate).

	The stronger you are in these areas, the better your chances of winning the top ad position.




How to use Bing Ads

How can I use Bing Ads to drive more people to my website?
Here are some tips to get better results:
	
Review your budget and bid strategy. If your ad keeps pausing, your budget limit may be set too low. Competitive bids help your ad stay in a strong position to catch eyes and get more clicks to your website.
Expand your targeting, both for location and for devices (computer, mobile and tablet).
Make sure your ads and website are relevant to the keywords you bid on. Would someone searching your terms expect to see and ad for your business?


How can I keep my costs down?
While your first instinct may be to lower your budget, first try lowering your maximum bids. Yes, this could mean fewer customers visit your site. But if you increase your quality score and build ads with a strong performance history, you may be able to win a good ad position with a lower bid. That would lower your cost=per-click and help stretch your budget.
How do I know if Bing Ads is working?
View a wide range of performance trends in your account to quickly see key stats: ad clicks, the number of times your ad appeared (impressions), spend, average cost-per-click, click-through rate, average ad position, cost per acquisition, and conversions. You can also run performance reports to get insights into how well your campaigns are doing.
Can I run more than one ad?
Yes! In fact, we encourage it. Only one ad will show at a time but running multiple ads lets you test different approaches to see what's working best with your target customers. Frequently, businesses try out different ads for specific products or pages.




Getting started with Bing Ads

How do I get started?
Sign up for Bing Ads
Which keywords should I choose?
You have a few options to help choose your keywords. First you'll want to think of the terms one of your customers might use to search for your products and offerings. Those search terms are a great starting point. Then you can use tools right in your account to find more keywords. Within Bing Ads, click Campaigns on the top of the page. Click the Keywords tab, and then click Add Keywords. This will let you:
	
Search for new keywords based on one you enter.
Search a website for keywords.
Search your destination URLs for keywords.


How can I write a good ad?
Here are a few tips that can help make your ad stand out.
	
Keep your ads relevant. One way to improve relevance is to use your customer's most popular search terms in your ad titles and txt.
Describe what sets your product apart.
Use your customers' language. Use words and writing tone that are likely to attract your typical customer.
Be specific. This clearer and more specific your offering, the better. For example, rather than "big discount," specify and exact percentage, such as "50 percent off."
Give customers a reason to click your ad right now. Offer a specific call to action, such as encouraging customers to request a brochure or consultation, download a free e-book, subscribe to a newsletter, or take advantage of a limited-time discount.























Sign up with Bing Ads to get started





































